This is Audible.

also those around them. Soldiers returning from home from combat may frighten their families with their rages and emotional absence. The wives of men who suffer from PTSD

by definition, is unbearable and intolerable. Most rape victims, combat soldiers, and children who have been molested become so upset when they think about what they

of terror, and the shame of utter weakness and vulnerability. While we all want to move beyond trauma, the part of our brain that is devoted to ensuring our survival, deep below our rationality, is the most important.

explosion of knowledge about the effects of psychological trauma, abuse, and neglect. Those new disciplines are neuroscience, the study of how the brain supports mental

neglect. Those new disciplines are neuroscience, the study of how the brain supports mental processes, developmental psychopathology, the study of

Developmental psychopathology, the study of the impact of adverse experiences on the development of mind and brain. And finally, interpersonal neurobiology, the study of the impact of adverse experiences on the development of mind and brain.

influences the emotions, biology, and mindsets of those around us. Research from these new disciplines has revealed that trauma produces actual physiological changes.

activity, and alterations in the system that filters relevant information from irrelevant. We now know that trauma compromises the brain area that communicates the physical, embodied feeling of

has also opened up new possibilities to palliate or even reverse the damage. We can now develop methods and experiences that utilize the brain's own natural neuroplasticity to help...

in the present and move on with their lives. There are fundamentally three avenues. One, top down by talking, reconnecting.

reconnecting with others, and allowing ourselves to know and understand what is going on with us while processing the memories of the trauma. 2. By taking medicines that shut down inappropriate

inappropriate alarm reactions or by utilizing other technologies to change the way the brain organizes information. And three, bottom-up. By allowing the body to have

Which one of these is best for any particular survivor is an empirical question. Most people I have worked with require a combination.

Centers for Disease Control, and a number of private foundations to study the efficacy of many different forms of treatment, from medications to talking, yoga, EMDR.

Lives seem to flow in a narrative. Mine had many stops and starts. That's what trauma does. It interrupts the plot. It just happens and then life goes on.

anything. In Vietnam, he quickly became a platoon leader in charge of eight other Marines. Surviving slogging through the mud while being strafed by machine gun fire can leave people feeling pretty good.

to be a living memorial to my friends who died in Vietnam. I was stunned. Tom's loyalty to the dead was keeping him from living his own life, just as his father did.

back from Da Nang. Tom's need to live out his life as a memorial to his comrades taught me that he was suffering from a condition much more complex than.

their size, of course, which gave them the potential to inflict much more harm than my two-footers at home. The reason was that I felt perfectly confident that, with proper care, my kids would be safe.

than my two-footers at home. The reason was that I felt perfectly confident that with proper care, my kids would gradually learn to deal with frustrations and disappointments.

that, with proper care, my kids would gradually learn to deal with frustrations and disappointments. But I was skeptical that I would be able to help my veterans reacquire the skills of self-control and self-discipline.

the nucleus of the neurosis is a physioneurosis. In other words, post-traumatic stress isn't all in one's head, as some people supposed.

difficult that process really is, since human beings are experts in wishful thinking and obscuring the truth. I remember him saying, The greatest sources of our suffering are the

thinking and obscuring the truth. I remember him saying, the greatest sources of our suffering are the lies we tell ourselves. Working at the VA, I soon discovered

I've remembered him saying, the greatest sources of our suffering are the lies we tell ourselves. Working at the VA, I soon discovered how excruciating it can be to face reality.

point during their relationship. We want to think of families as safe havens in a heartless world and of our own country as populated by enlightened, civilized people.

in a heartless world and of our own country as populated by enlightened, civilized people. We prefer to believe that cruelty occurs only in faraway places like Darwin.

Is it any wonder, then, that the traumatized individuals themselves cannot tolerate remembering it, and that they often resort to using drugs, alcohol, or self-mutilation to block out their unbearable pain?

The first study I did at the VA started with systematically asking veterans what had happened to them in Vietnam. I wanted to know what had pushed them over the brink.

flashbacks of the ambush was the memory of what happened afterward. I could easily imagine how Tom's rage about his friend's death had led to the calamity that followed. It took him months of dealing with the death of his friend, but it was not the end of the story.

frenzy in a neighboring village, killing children, shooting an innocent farmer, and raping a Vietnamese woman. After that it became truly impossible for him to go home again in any

just like her, or watch your son take his first step when you are reminded of the child you murdered. Tom experienced the death of Alex as if part of himself had been forever destroyed.

Whether it is the result of something done to you, or something you yourself have done, almost always makes it difficult to engage in intimate relationships. After you have experienced something so unspeakable,

who had survived the ambush. It takes enormous trust and courage to allow yourself to remember. One of the hardest things for traumatized people is to confront their

during the traumatic episode, whether it is objectively warranted, as in the commission of atrocities, or not, as in the case of a child who tries to placate her abuser.

as in the commission of atrocities, or not, as in the case of a child who tries to placate her abuser. One of the first people to write about this phenomenon was Sarah Haley, who occupied...

One of the first people to write about this phenomenon was Sarah Haley, who occupied an office next to mine at the VA clinic. In an article entitled, When the Patient Reports Atrocities,

the horrendous acts that are often committed by soldiers in the course of their war experiences. It's hard enough to face the suffering that has been inflicted by others, but deep down many traumatized people

pain and pleasure. We will return to this dilemma throughout this book. Numbing. Maybe the worst of times.

NUMBING Maybe the worst of Tom's symptoms was that he felt emotionally numb. He desperately wanted to love his family, but he just couldn't evoke any.

And there were many occasions on which he stayed up all night to immerse himself in something that actually excited him. It was like being in combat, he said. He felt fully alive, and nothing else mattered.

Tom tried to stay busy, working, drinking, and drugging, doing anything to avoid confronting his demons. He kept thumbing through Soldier of Fortune magazine, fantasizing about enlisting as a mercenary.

The Reorganization of Perception. Another study I conducted at the VA started out as research about nightmares, but ended up exploring how trauma changes people's perception.

responses to the Rorschach are almost impossible to fake. Rorschach provides us with a unique way to observe how people construct mental images from what is basically a meaningless stimulus, a blot of ink.

Rorschach provides us with a unique way to observe how people construct mental images from what is basically a meaningless stimulus, a blot of ink. Because humans are meaning making creatures.

They were right, of course, but the normal human response to ambiguous stimuli is to use our imagination to read something into them. We learn from these Rorschach tests that trauma is a natural process.

them. We learn from these Rorschach tests that traumatized people have a tendency to superimpose their trauma on everything around them and have trouble deciphering whatever is going on around them.

16 men, for in viewing scenes from the past in those blots, they were not displaying the mental flexibility that is the hallmark of imagination. They simply kept replaying an old reel.

that is the hallmark of imagination. They simply kept replaying an old reel. Imagination is absolutely critical to the quality of our lives.

an old reel. Imagination is absolutely critical to the quality of our lives. Our imagination enables us to leave our routine everyday existence

They felt a renewed sense of the comradeship that had been so vital to their war experience. They insisted that I had to be part of their newfound unit, and gave me a Marine captain's uniform for my

insisted that I had to be part of their newfound unit, and gave me a Marine captain's uniform for my birthday. In retrospect, that gesture revealed part of the problem. You were either in...

all old enough to be my father. We met on Monday mornings at 8 o'clock. In Boston, winter snowstorms occasionally paralyze the public transit system, but to my amazement...

or how their helicopter had been shot down in the jungles of Vietnam. Whether the trauma had occurred 10 years in the past or more than 40, my patients could not bridge the gap between reality and reality.

the jungles of Vietnam. Whether the trauma had occurred 10 years in the past, or more than 40, my patients could not bridge the gap between their wartime experiences and their current lives.

jungles of Vietnam. Whether the trauma had occurred 10 years in the past or more than 40, my patients could not bridge the gap between their wartime experiences and their current lives.

wartime experiences and their current lives. Somehow, the very event that caused them so much pain had also become their sole source of meaning. They felt fully alive only when they were

alive only when they were revisiting their traumatic past. Diagnosing Post-Traumatic Stress.

in our textbooks. But for all our efforts it became clear that we were actually accomplishing very little. The powerful drugs we prescribed often left the man in such a fog that he

Did the memories of those suffering from PTSD differ from those of others? For most people, the memory of an unpleasant event eventually fades or is transformed into something more pleasant.

This was puzzling, as the Standard Textbook of Psychiatry at the time stated that incest was extremely rare in the United States, occurring about once in every million women.

serious and credible enough to force local child protective services or the courts to take action. In other words, for every soldier who serves in a war zone abroad, there are

and our relationship to our physical reality, the core of who we are. We have learned that trauma is not just an event that took place sometime in the past.

enough. The act of telling the story doesn't necessarily alter the automatic physical and hormonal responses of bodies that remain hypervigilant, prepared to be assaulted.

bodies that remain hyper-vigilant, prepared to be assaulted or violated at any time. For real change to take place, the body needs to learn that the danger has passed.

Chapter 2 Revolutions in Understanding Mind and Brain ¶ The greater the doubt, the greater the awakening. The smaller the doubt, the smaller the awakening.

However, many later studies have confirmed the relevance of those midnight confessions. We now know that more than half the people who seek psychiatric care have been assaulted.

suicidal thoughts and self-destructive behaviors, rather than on understanding the possible causes of their despair and helplessness. I was also struck by how little attention was paid to the fact that there was a lot of self-destruction in the United States. I was also struck by how little attention was paid to the fact that there was a lot

and others like it, helped me formulate this rule for my students. If you do something to a patient that you would not do to your friends or children, consider whether you are

schizoaffective. He paused and stroked his chin, apparently deep in thought. I think I'd call him Michael McIntyre, he replied. He paused and stroked his chin, apparently deep in thought. I think I'd call him Michael McIntyre, he replied. Simrad taught us that

The greatest sources of our suffering are the lies we tell ourselves, he'd say, urging us to be honest with ourselves about every facet of our experience. He often said that people

our thoughts and worldly accomplishments. Healing, he told us, depends on experiential knowledge. You can be fully in charge of your life only if you can acknowledge the reality

Amazing results made us optimistic that we could finally conquer human misery. Anti-psychotic drugs were a major factor in reducing the number of people living

Anti-psychotic drugs were a major factor in reducing the number of people living in mental hospitals in the United States from over 500,000 in

The forward to the landmark 1980 DSM-3 was appropriately modest and acknowledged that this diagnostic system was imprecise, so imprecise

and then shocked the dogs again. A group of controlled dogs who had never been shocked before immediately ran away. But the dogs, who had earlier been subjected to inescapable shock.

Lay there, whimpering and defecating. The mere opportunity to escape does not necessarily make traumatized animals or people take the road to freedom.

Frank Putnam at the National Institute of Mental Health, the NIMH, and Roger Pittman, later at Harvard, were all finding that traumatized people keep secreting large amounts of stress

to baseline after the threat has passed. Ideally, our stress hormone system should provide a lightning-fast response to threat, but then quickly return us to equilibrium.

Ideally, our stress hormone system should provide a lightning-fast response to threat, but then quickly return us to equilibrium. In PTSD patients, however, the stress hormone system fails at this point.

For example, he and Seligman had found that the only way to teach the traumatized dogs to get off the electric grids when the doors were open was to repeatedly drag

For example, he and Seligman had found that the only way to teach the traumatized dogs to get off the electric grids when the doors were open was to repeatedly drag them

Further animal studies involving mice, rats, cats, monkeys, and elephants brought more intriguing data. For example, when researchers played a loud, intrusive sound,

intrusive sound. Mice that had been raised in a warm nest with plenty of food scurried home immediately. But another group, raised in a noisy nest with scarce food supplies, was still on the move.

nest, with scarce food supplies, also ran for home, even after spending time in more pleasant surroundings.

One of the things that struck my colleague Mark Greenberg and me when we ran therapy groups for Vietnam combat veterans was how, despite their feelings of horror and grief,

struck my colleague Mark Greenberg and me when we ran therapy groups for Vietnam combat veterans was how, despite their feelings of horror and grief, many of them seemed to come to life when they talked about their

and then started to stalk her. She finally became motivated to return to treatment when she was once again severely beaten. Freud had a term for such traumatic reenactment.

repulsion to repeat. He and many of his followers believed that reenactments were an unconscious attempt to get control over a painful situation, and that they eventually could lead to

mastery and resolution. There is no evidence for that theory. Repetition leads only to further pain and self-hatred. In fact, even reliving the trauma repeatedly and thinking about it is not enough.

In fact, even reliving the trauma repeatedly in therapy may reinforce preoccupation and fixation. Mark Greenberg and I decided to learn more about attractors.

just as with drug addiction, we start to crave the activity and experience withdrawal when it's not available. In the long run, people become more preoccupied with the pain of withdrawal.

forgotten movie clip. Seven of the eight veterans kept their hands in the painfully cold water thirty percent longer during platoon. We then calculated that the amount

He concluded that Beecher's speculation that strong emotions can block pain was the result of the release of morphine-like substances manufactured in the brain. This suggested that for many

N.P. meeting was, if possible, even more thought-provoking than the previous year's session. King's college professor, Jeffrey Gray, gave a talk about the amygdala, a cluster of

more thought-provoking than the previous year's session. King's college professor, Jeffrey Gray, gave a talk about the amygdala, a cluster of brain cells that determines whether a sound

King's college professor, Jeffrey Gray, gave a talk about the amygdala, a cluster of brain cells that determines whether a sound, image, or body sensation is perceived.

least in part, on the amount of the neurotransmitter serotonin in that part of the brain. Animals with low serotonin levels were hyperreactive to stressful stimuli like

emerged from the pact to assume leadership. The social environment interacts with brain chemistry, manipulating a monkey into a lower position in the dominance hierarchy.

while chemically enhancing serotonin elevated the rank of former subordinates. The implications for traumatized people were obvious. Like Gray's low serotonin

This was a patient who had always struggled merely to get through the day. After her appointment, I called someone I knew at Eli Lilly and said, You have a drug that

But maybe the mother's kisses that soothe her child's scrapes are just a placebo as well. Prozac worked significantly better than the placebo for the patients from the trauma clinic.

over their emotions and were less preoccupied with the past than those who received a sugar pill. Surprisingly, however, the Prozac had no effect at all on the combat veterans at the VA.

The drug revolution that started out with so much promise may in the end have done as much harm as good. The theory that mental illness is caused primarily by chemical imbalances in the brain

has become broadly accepted by the media and the public, as well as by the medical profession. In many places, drugs have displaced therapy and enabled patients to suppress their problems.

it out. Medications often can bring life-saving relief. The SSRIs can be very helpful in making traumatized people less enslaved by their emotions, but they should only

have a serious downside, as they may deflect attention from dealing with the underlying issues. The brain disease model takes control over people's fate.

continues to increase, it has not made a dent in hospital admissions for depression. The number of people treated for depression has tripled over the past two decades, and one in

increase, it has not made a dent in hospital admissions for depression. The number of people treated for depression has tripled over the past two decades and one in ten Americans

up from 1.65 billion in 1999. The number of people under the age of 20 receiving Medicaid-funded prescriptions for anti-psychotic drugs tripled between 1999 and 2010.

psychotics through Medicaid. One study, based on Medicaid data in 13 states, found that 12.4 percent of children in foster care received antipsychotics, compared with

disease. The brain disease model overlooks four fundamental truths. One, our capacity to destroy one another is matched by

communicating our experiences, helping us to define what we know, and finding a common sense of meaning. Three, we have the ability to regulate our own physiology, including some of the so-called

dimensions of humanity, we deprive people of ways to heal from trauma and restore their autonomy. Being a patient rather than a participant in one's healing process.

separates suffering people from their community, and alienates them from an inner sense of self. Given the limitations of drugs, I started to wonder if we could find more natural ways.

You observe a lot by watching Yogi Berra.

dreamed of capacities to gain a sophisticated understanding about the way the brain processes information.

based on advanced physics and computer technology rapidly made neuroscience into one of the most popular areas for research. Positron Emission Tomography

Positron Emission Tomography, known as PET, and later Functional Magnetic Resonance Imaging, known as fMRI,

processed memories, sensations, and emotions, and began to map the circuits of mind and consciousness. The earlier technology of measuring brain chemicals like serotonin or norepinephrine

participant and carefully constructed a script that recreated their trauma moment by moment. We deliberately tried to collect just isolated fragments of their experience, particular images.

their happy laughter had become a painful trigger. Even hiding behind her paperwork, she could barely make it through the day. In a futile attempt to keep her feelings at bay, she coped by working day and night.

It was already well known that intense emotions activate the limbic system, in particular an area within it called the amygdala. We depend on the amygdala to warn us of impending danger.

with alarm, even as in Marsha's case, 13 years after the event. Activation of this fear center triggers the cascade of stress hormones and nerve impulses that drive

Speechless horror. Our most surprising finding was a white spot in the left frontal lobe of the cortex in a region called Broca's area.

Our scans showed that Braca's area went offline whenever a flashback was triggered. In other words, we have visual proof that the effects of trauma are not necessarily different from and can be.

rage and helplessness, as well as the impulse to fight or flee, but these feelings are almost impossible to articulate. Trauma, by nature, drives us to the edge of comprehension.

mean that people can't talk about a tragedy that has befallen them. Sooner or later, most survivors, like the veterans in Chapter 1, come up with what many of them call their cover story that offers some

the fallen them. Sooner or later, most survivors, like the veterans in Chapter 1, come up with what many of them call their cover story that offers some explanation for their symptoms

I reported what I saw and heard, but only part of it. For most of it, I have no words. When words fail,

When words fail, haunting images capture the experience and return as nightmares and flashbacks. In contrast to the deactivation of Broca's area, another region

so long after the original experience of the trauma. Under ordinary conditions, raw images registered in Area 19 are rapidly diffused to other brain areas that interpret them.

if the trauma were actually occurring. As we will see in chapter 12, which discusses memory, other unprocessed sense fragments of trauma like sounds and smells and physical sensations

Our scans clearly showed that images of past trauma activate the right hemisphere of the brain and deactivate the left. We now know that the two halves of the brain do speak different languages.

that images of past trauma activate the right hemisphere of the brain and deactivate the left. We now know that the two halves of the brain do speak different languages. The right is intuitive, emotional,

emotional, visual, spatial, and tactual, and the left is linguistic, sequential, and analytical. While the left half of the brain does all the talking, the right half of the brain carries the music.

subjective experiences to others. The left and right sides of the brain also process the imprints of the past in dramatically different ways. The left brain

The right sides of the brain also process the imprints of the past in dramatically different ways. The left brain remembers facts, statistics, and the vocabulary.

remembers facts, statistics, and the vocabulary of events. We called on it to explain our experiences and put them in order. The right brain

numbers, facts, statistics, and the vocabulary of events. We called on it to explain our experiences and put them in order. The right brain stored

the vocabulary of events. We called on it to explain our experiences and put them in order. The right brain stores memories of sound, touch, smell, and the emotions they evoke.

It reacts automatically to voices, facial features, and gestures and places experienced in the past. What it recalls feels like intuitive truth.

sequences and to translate our shifting feelings and perceptions into words. Broca's area, which blacks out during flashbacks, is on the left side. Without sequencing

In technical terms, they are experiencing the loss of executive functioning. When something reminds traumatized people of the past, their

Something reminds traumatized people of the past. Their right brain reacts as if the traumatic event were happening in the present. But because their left brain is not working very well, they may not be aware that they are

terrified, enraged, shamed, or frozen. After the emotional storm passes, they may look for something or somebody to blame for it. They behave the way they do.

increased heart rate and blood pressure readings reflected her physiological state of frantic alarm.

is one of the hormones that are critical to help us fight back or flee in the face of danger. Increased adrenaline was responsible for our participants' dramatic rise in heart rate and blood pressure.

We now know that there is another possible response to threat, which our scans aren't yet capable of measuring. Some people simply go into denial. Their bodies regularly

Their bodies register the threat, but their conscious minds go on as if nothing has happened. However, even though the mind may learn to ignore the messages from the emotional brain, the emotional mind will not.

to tense for action, or immobilize in collapse. The physical effects on the organs go on unabated until they demand notice when they are expressed as illness.

The rational brain is basically impotent to talk the emotional brain out of its own reality. I am continually impressed by how difficult it is for people who have gone through the unspeakable to convey the

love and he was able to grasp that the tragedy they had witnessed had come to an end. During disasters, young children usually take their cues from their parents. As long as their care-giver is there, they will take care of themselves.

But Noam's experience allows us to see, in outline, two critical aspects of the adaptive response to threat that is basic to human survival. At the time the disaster occurred, we had no idea what to do. We had no idea what to do.

reached the safety of home, the alarm bells in his brain, and body, quieted. This freed his mind to make some sense of what had happened and even to imagine a creative alternative

brain, and body, quieted. This freed his mind to make some sense of what had happened and even to imagine a creative alternative to what he had seen, a life-saving trampoline.

War II Army issue watch for Christmas, but it was a sad memento of the year their lives had effectively stopped, 1944. Being traumatized means

After trauma, the world is experienced with a different nervous system. A survivor's energy now becomes focused on suppressing inner chaos at the expense of spontaneity.

experienced with a different nervous system. A survivor's energy now becomes focused on suppressing inner chaos at the expense of spontaneous involvement in their lives.

it partially shuts down the higher brain, our conscious brain, and propels the body to run, hide, fight, or, on occasion, freeze. By the time we are fully aware of our situation,

We recover our internal equilibrium and gradually regain our senses. If for some reason the normal response is blocked, for example, when people are held down,

prone to continue the action, or rather the futile attempt at action, which began when the thing happened. Being able to move and do something to protect yourself.

the futile attempt at action, which began when the thing happened. Being able to move and do something to protect yourself is a critical factor in determining whether or not a whore

The brain, from bottom to top. The most important job of the brain is to ensure our survival.

everything else is secondary. In order to do that, brains need to do the following. 1. Generate internal signals that register what our bodies need.

1. Generate internal signals that register what our bodies need, such as food, rest, protection, sex, and shelter. 2. Create a map of the world.

and thrive in groups, all of these imperatives require coordination and collaboration. Psychological problems occur when our internal signals don't work, when our maps don't lead us.

coordination, and collaboration. Psychological problems occur when our internal signals don't work, when our maps don't lead us where we need to go, when we are too paralyzed to move, when our

Psychological problems occur when our internal signals don't work, when our maps don't lead us where we need to go, when we are too paralyzed to move, when our actions do not correspond to our needs.

and figuring out how to accomplish our goals, manage our time, and sequence our actions. Beneath the rational brain lie two evolutionarily older, and to some degree separate,

just as it did in the course of evolution. The most primitive part, the part that is already on line when we are born, is the ancient animal brain, often called the reptilian brain.

hunger, wetness and pain, and rid the body of toxins by urinating and defecating. The brain stem and the hypothalamus, which sits directly above it,

The entire organism is thrown into disequilibrium. It is amazing how many psychological problems involve difficulties with sleep, appetite, touch.

Any effective treatment for trauma has to address these basic housekeeping functions of the body. Right above the reptilian brain is the limbic system.

Attend any two-year-old's birthday party, and notice how little Kimberly will engage you, play with you, flirt with you, without any need for language. These early explorations shape the limbic structure.

little Kimberly will engage you, play with you, flirt with you, without any need for language. These early explorations shaped the limbic structures devoted to emotions and memory.

These early explorations shape the limbic structures devoted to emotions and memory. But these structures can also be significantly modified by later experiences, for the better by a close friendship or a

structures devoted to emotions and memory, but these structures can also be significantly modified by later experiences, for the better by a close friendship or a beautiful first love, for example.

at the heart of the central nervous system and its key task is to look out for your welfare. If it detects danger or a special opportunity, such as a promising partner,

prefer, whether we like to garden or sing in a choir, and whom we befriend, and whom we detest. The emotional brain's cellular organization and biochemistry are simpler than

leaving our conscious, rational capacities to catch up later, often well after the threat is over. Finally, we reach the top layer of the brain that

The ancient philosophers called seven years the age of reason. For us, first grade is the prelude of things to come. A life organized around frontal

understanding abstract and symbolic ideas, planning for tomorrow, and being in tune with teachers and classmates. The frontal lobes are responsible for the qualities that make a.

and being in tune with teachers and classmates. The frontal lobes are responsible for the qualities that make us unique within the animal kingdom. They enable us to use language and abstract thought.

if we take one action, like applying for a new job, or neglect another, such as not paying the rent. They make choice possible and underlie our astonishing creativity.

In a lucky accident, a group of Italian scientists identified specialized cells in the cortex that came to be known as mirror neurons. The researchers had attached electrodes

in a monkey's premotor area, then set up a computer to monitor precisely which neurons fired when the monkey picked up a peanut or grasped a banana. At one point, an experimenter

At one point, an experimenter was putting food pellets into a box when he looked up at the computer. The monkey's brain cells were firing at the exact location where the motor command neurons.

Monkey's brain cells were firing at the exact location where the motor command neurons were located. But the monkey wasn't eating or moving. He was watching the researcher, and his brain was vicariously

But the monkey wasn't eating or moving. He was watching the researcher, and his brain was vicariously mirroring the researcher's actions. Numerous other

and even the development of language. One writer compared mirror neurons to neural Wi-Fi. We pick up not only another person's movement.

Realizing that other people can think and feel differently from us is a huge developmental step for two- and three-year-olds. They learn to understand others motives so they can adapt and stay safe.

rouses our desires, or blow up every time we're angry. But it's exactly on that edge between impulse and acceptable behavior where most of our troubles begin. The more intense the

But it's exactly on that edge between impulse and acceptable behavior where most of our troubles begin. The more intense the visceral sensory input from the emotional brain,

The more intense the visceral sensory input from the emotional brain, the less capacity the rational brain has to put a damper on it.

Identifying Danger. The Cook and the Smoke Detector. Danger is a normal part of life, and the brain is in charge of detecting it and organizing our reactions.

world arrives through our eyes, nose, ears, and skin. These sensations converge in the thalamus, an area inside the limbic system that acts as the cook within the brain.

associated fragments and normal memory processing disintegrates. Time freezes so that the present danger feels like it will last forever.

smoke detector is to identify whether incoming input is relevant for our survival. It does so quickly and automatically with the help of feedback from the hippocampus, a nearby structure that relates the new input.

It does so quickly and automatically, with the help of feedback from the hippocampus, a nearby structure that relates the new input to past experiences. If the amygdala senses a threat,

a person on the street who looks threatening. It sends an instant message down to the hypothalamus and the brainstem, recruiting the stress hormone system and the autonomic nervous system.

receives from the thalamus faster than the frontal lobes do, it decides whether incoming information is a threat to our survival even before we are consciously aware of the danger.

By the time we realize what is happening, our body may already be on the move. The amygdala's danger signals trigger the release of powerful stress hormones, including cortisol,

whether their intentions are benign or dangerous. Even a slight misreading can lead to painful misunderstandings in relationships at home and at work.

controlling the stress response, the watchtower. If the amygdala is the smoke detector in the

If the amygdala is the smoke detector in the brain, think of the frontal lobes, and specifically the medial prefrontal cortex, or MPFC, located directly above our eyes.

directly above our eyes, as the watchtower, offering a view of the scene from on high. Is that smoke you smell the sign that your house is on fire and you need to get out fast?

over too high a flame. The amygdala doesn't make such judgments. It just gets you ready to fight back or escape, even before the frontal lobes get a chance to weigh in with their assessment.

ready to fight back or escape, even before the frontal lobes get a chance to weigh in with their assessment. As long as you are not too upset, your frontal lobes can restore your balance by helping you realize

lobes get a chance to weigh in with their assessment. As long as you are not too upset, your frontal lobes can restore your balance by helping you realize that you are responding to a false alarm.

hover calmly and objectively over our thoughts, feelings, and emotions—an ability I'll call mindfulness throughout this book—and then take our time to respond, allows the

temper every time a waiter is late with our order or an insurance company agent puts us on hold. Our watchtower tells us that other people's anger and threats

function of their emotional state. When that system breaks down, we become like conditioned animals. The moment we detect danger, we automatically go into fight or flight mode.

we automatically go into fight-or-flight mode. In PTSD, the critical balance between the amygdala, in this case the small one,

the critical balance between the amygdala, in this case the smoke detector, and the MPFC, our watchtower, shifts radically.

and anger all increase the activation of subcortical brain regions involved in emotions and significantly reduce the activity in various areas in the frontal lobe.

subcortical brain regions, involved in emotions, and significantly reduce the activity in various areas in the frontal lobe, particularly the MPFC.

lobe, particularly the MPFC. When that occurs, the inhibitory capacities of the frontal lobe break down and people take leave of their senses.

take leave of their senses. They may startle in response to any loud sound, become enraged by small frustrations, or freeze when somebody touches them.

them. Effectively dealing with stress depends upon achieving a balance between the smoke detector and the watchtower. If you want to manage your emotions better, your brain gives you...

your brain gives you two options. You can learn to regulate them from the top down or from the bottom up. Knowing the difference between top down and bottom up regulation

gives you two options. You can learn to regulate them from the top down or from the bottom up. Knowing the difference between top down and bottom up regulation.

and yoga can help with this. Bottom-up regulation involves recalibrating the autonomic nervous system, which, as we have seen, originates in the brainstem.

can help with this. Bottom-up regulation involves recalibrating the autonomic nervous system, which, as we have seen, originates in the brainstem.

involves recalibrating the autonomic nervous system, which as we have seen originates in the brainstem. We can access the ANS through breath

can function relatively independently. If, say, you are driving along, chatting with a friend, and a truck suddenly looms in the corner of your eye, you instantly stop talking.

Let's say you are driving along, chatting with a friend, and a truck suddenly looms in the corner of your eye. You instantly stop talking, slam on the brakes, and turn your steering wheel to get out of harm's way.

chatting with a friend, and a truck suddenly looms in the corner of your eye, you instantly stop talking, slam on the brakes, and turn your steering wheel to get out of harm's way. If your instinctive...

competent rider, and his unruly horse. As long as the weather is calm and the path is smooth, the rider can feel in excellent control.

forcing the rider to hold on for dear life. Likewise, when people feel that their survival is at stake or they are seized by rages, longings, fear, or sexual desire,

They stop listening to the voice of reason, and it makes little sense to argue with them. Whenever the limbic system decides that something is a question of life or death, the pathway to the truth is to stop.

and the limbic system become extremely tenuous. Psychologists usually try to help people use insight and understanding to manage their behavior. However,

their behavior. However, neuroscience research shows that very few psychological problems are the result of defects in understanding. Most originate in pressures from deeper regions in the brain.

When our emotional and rational brains are in conflict, as when we're enraged with someone we love, frightened by someone we depend on, or lust after someone who is off-limits.

A tug-of-war ensues. This war is largely played out in the theatre of visceral experience—your gut, your heart, your lungs—and will lead to both physical discomfort

The next thing they knew, a truck driver was standing on the hood of their car with a fire extinguisher. He smashed the windshield to free them, and Stan climbed through the opening.

exposure to radiation.

while they were trapped in the car. Stan went first and immediately went into a flashback, just as Marsha had in our Harvard study. He came out of the scanner, sweating, with his

felt during the accident, he reported. I was sure I was going to die, and there was nothing I could do to save myself. Instead of remembering the accident as something that had happened three months earlier,

Dissociation and Reliving Dissociation is the essence of trauma. The overwhelming experience is stress.

of memory intrude into the present where they are literally relived. As long as the trauma is not resolved, the stress hormones that the body secretes to protect itself keep circulating.

As long as the trauma is not resolved, the stress hormones that the body secretes to protect itself keep circulating. And the defensive movements and emotional responses keep getting replaced.

D, a flashback can occur at any time, whether they are awake or asleep. There is no way of knowing when it's going to occur again or how long it will last.

how long it will last. People who suffer from flashbacks often organize their lives around trying to protect against them. They may compulsively go to the gym to pump iron, but

may compulsively go to the gym to pump iron, but find that they are never strong enough, numb themselves with drugs, or try to cultivate an illusory sense of control and highly dangerous

dangerous situations, like motorcycle racing, bungee jumping, or working as an ambulance driver. Constantly fighting unseen dangers is exhausting.

or working as an ambulance driver. Constantly fighting unseen dangers is exhausting, and leaves them fatigued, depressed, and weary.

Constantly fighting unseen dangers is exhausting, and leaves them fatigued, depressed, and weary. If elements of the trauma are replayed again,

and makes them feel they don't belong to the human race. Feeling numb during birthday parties for your kids or in response to the death of loved ones makes people feel like monsters.

That is where therapy comes in. It is the beginning of bringing the emotions that were generated by trauma, being able to feel, the capacity to observe oneself online.

that were generated by trauma, being able to feel, the capacity to observe oneself online. However, the bottom line is that the threat perception system of the brain has changed.

imprint of the past. The trauma that started out there is now played out on the battlefield of their own bodies, usually without a conscious connection between what

life-saving responses if a truck has just smashed into your car. It's important to have an efficient smoke detector. You don't want to get caught unawares by a raging fire.

need to be online. Therapy won't work as long as people keep being pulled back into the past. The thalamus.

Therapy won't work as long as people keep being pulled back into the past. The thalamus shuts down.

they were during the original trauma. As I've said, the thalamus functions as a cook, a relay station that collects sensations from the ears, eyes, and skin and integrates them

on the page, your thalamus is helping you distinguish between sensory information that is relevant and information that you can safely ignore. In chapter 19 on neurofeedback.

The medical term for Uta's response is depersonalization. Anyone who deals with traumatized men, women, or children

later confronted with blank stares and absent minds, the outward manifestation of the biological freeze reaction. Depersonalization is one symptom of the massive disease.

in PTSD is that it's so difficult to feel truly alive right now. When you can't be fully here, you go to the places where you do feel alive, even if those places are filled

walk, cooking a meal, or playing with your kids, life will pass you by. Chapter 5 Body-Brain Connection

1859, and The Descent of Man, 1871. But the expression of the emotions turns out to be an extraordinary exploration of the foundations of emotional life.

as well as close to home stories of Darwin's children and household pets. It's also a landmark in book illustration, one of the first books ever to include photographs.

close-to-home stories of Darwin's children and household pets. It's also a landmark in book illustration, one of the first books ever to include photographs.

Angry expressions and threatening postures caution them to back off. Sadness attracts care and attention. Fear signals helplessness or alerts us to danger.

Angry expressions and threatening postures caution them to back off. Sadness attracts care and attention. Fear signals helplessness or alerts us to danger.

68% reported other incidents of childhood sexual abuse. Women who were younger at the time of the incident and those who were molested by someone they knew were more likely to have

Women who were younger at the time of the incident and those who were molested by someone they knew were more likely to have forgotten their abuse. The study also examined the reliability

It shows that memories that are retrieved tend to return to the memory bank with modifications. As long as a memory is inaccessible, the mind is unable to change it.

As long as a memory is inaccessible, the mind is unable to change it. But as soon as a story starts being told, particularly if it is told repeatedly,

it. But as soon as a story starts being told, particularly if it is told repeatedly, it changes. The act of telling itself changes the tale.

known as the lost in the mall experiment, for example. Academic researchers have shown that it is relatively easy to implant memories of events that never took place.

of subjects in these studies later recall that they were frightened and even fill in missing details. But such recollections involve none of the visceral terror that a lost child would actually experience.

none of the visceral terror that a lost child would actually experience. Another line of research documented the unreliability of eyewitness testimony. Subjects might be

question, but they have little relevance to traumatic memory. The fundamental problem is this. Events that take place in the laboratory cannot be considered equivalent to the

We continued, Do you ever have a vivid, precise recollection of the speech you gave as a valedictorian? Or do you ever have intense sensations recalling the birth of your first child?

Or, do you ever have intense sensations recalling the birth of your first child? The replies were all in the negative.

Do you ever experience the same physical sensations you had when you were raped? Such questions precipitated powerful emotional responses. That is why I cannot go to parties anymore.

me in a particular way, I feel like I am being raped again. There were two major differences between how people talked about memories of positive versus traumatic experiences.

There were two major differences between how people talked about memories of positive versus traumatic experiences. One, how the memories were organized. And two, their physical and mental state.

There were two major differences between how people talked about memories of positive versus traumatic experiences. One, how the memories were organized. And two, their physical reactions to them.

1. how the memories were organized, and 2. their physical reactions to them. Weddings, births, and graduations were recalled as events from the past.

recalled as events from the past, stories with a beginning, a middle, and an end. Nobody said that there were periods when they had completely forgotten any of these events.

disorganized. Our subject remembered some details all too clearly—the smell of the rapist, the gash in the forehead of a dead child—but could not recall the sequence of events

details all too clearly—the smell of the rapist, the gash in the forehead of a dead child—but could not recall the sequence of events or other vital details. The first person who

recall the sequence of events or other vital details, the first person who arrived to help, and whether an ambulance or a police car took them to the hospital.

who arrived to help, and whether an ambulance or a police car took them to the hospital. We also asked the participants how they recalled their trauma at three points in time.

and whether an ambulance or a police car took them to the hospital. We also asked the participants how they recalled their trauma at three points in time, right after it happened.

participants said that they had not been able to tell anybody precisely what had happened immediately following the event. This will not surprise anyone who has worked in an emergency room or ambulance service.

Even more sensory details and feelings were activated, but most participants also started to be able to make sense out of them. They began to know what had happened, and to be able to tell the story to others.

a coherent story, with a beginning, a middle, and an end. Only a few were missing significant details. We noted that the five who said they had been abused by their parents were not.

In essence, our study confirmed the dual memory system that Chenet and his colleagues at the Salpêtrière had described more than a hundred years earlier. Traumatic memories are fundamental.

our study confirmed the dual memory system that Chenet and his colleagues at the Salpêtrière had described more than a hundred years earlier. Traumatic memories are fundamentally different from the stories we tell about the past.

that is safe, manageable, and predictable, and victims remind us that this is not always the case. In order to understand trauma, we have to overcome our natural reluctance to

And her later emails to me Nancy struggled to capture the existential reality of trauma. I want to tell you what a flashback is like. It is...

Nancy struggled to capture the existential reality of trauma. I want to tell you what a flashback is like. It is as if time is folded or warped.

I exist in a dual state. A pervasive numbness covers me with a blanket, and yet the touch of a small child pulls me back to the world. For a moment I am present.

only to find a new one. There are so many pieces of that 45 minutes of my life that remain unknown. My memories are still incomplete and fragmented, but I no longer think that I need to...

the case. After about six more months I made two choices that proved provident. I left my CBT therapist to work with a psychodynamic therapist.

support that had been distant in my life since the trauma. This combination of core strengthening, psychological, social, and physical, created a sense of personal safety and mastery.

treat a war or abuse, rape, molestation, or any other horrendous event for that matter. What has happened cannot be undone.

The fog that keeps you from staying on task, and from engaging fully in what you were doing. Being unable to fully open your heart to another human being.

and from engaging fully in what you were doing. Being unable to fully open your heart to another human being. Trauma robs you of the feeling that you are in charge of yourself.

people this involves, one, finding a way to become calm and focused. Two, learning to maintain that calm in response to images, thoughts, sounds, or physical sounds.

that calm in response to images, thoughts, sounds, or physical sensations that remind you of the past. Three, finding a way to be fully alive in the present and engaged with

3. Finding a way to be fully alive in the present and engaged with the people around you. 4. Not having to keep secrets from yourself, including secrets about the ways

than a story about something that happened long ago. The emotions and physical sensations that were imprinted during the trauma are experienced not as memories, but as disruptive

that happened long ago. The emotions and physical sensations that were imprinted during the trauma are experienced not as memories, but as disruptive physical reactions.

heart pounding, breathing becoming fast and shallow, feelings of heartbreak, speaking with an uptight and reedy voice, and the characteristic body movements that signify

that you are not to blame for having been raped. Understanding why you feel a certain way does not change how you feel. But it can keep you from surrendering to

Understanding why you feel a certain way does not change how you feel, but it can keep you from surrendering to intense reactions.

and emotional brains, so that you can feel in charge of how you respond and how you conduct your life. When we're triggered into states of hyper- or hypo-arousal, we are pushed outside of

that we have a host of inbuilt skills to keep us on an even keel. In Chapter 5, we saw how emotions are registered in the body. Some 80% of the fibers of the vagus nerve, which

to keep us on an even keel. In chapter five, we saw how emotions are registered in the body. Some 80% of the fibers of the vagus nerve, which connects the brain with many internal organs.

in mainstream culture. In research supported by the National Institutes of Health, my colleagues and I have shown that 10 weeks of yoga practice markedly reduced

hyper-aroused or shut down, that they have trouble focusing and prioritizing. Learning how to breathe calmly and remaining in a state of relative

as explained in chapter 5. The more you stay focused on your breathing, the more you will benefit, particularly if you pay attention until the very end of the out-breath

Mindfulness, Movement, Rhythms and Action, Yoga in India, Tai Chi and Qigong in China,

PTSD. Number two, no mind without mindfulness. At the core of recovery is self-awareness. The most important.

At the core of recovery is self-awareness. The most important phrases in trauma therapy are notice that and what happens next.

shrinkers, fear making love and avoid many social activities, their sensory world is largely off limits.

to your inner experience. The first step is to allow your mind to focus on your sensations, and notice how, in contrast to the timeless, ever-present experience of trauma,

shifts in body position, changes in breathing, and shifts in thinking. Once you pay attention to your physical sensations, the next step is to label them.

Once you pay attention to your physical sensations, the next step is to label them, as in, when I feel anxious, I feel a crushing sensation.

Once you pay attention to your physical sensations, the next step is to label them as in, when I feel anxious, I feel a crushing sensation in my chest.

when I feel anxious, I feel a crushing sensation in my chest. I may then say to a patient, focus on that sensation and see how it changes when you take a deep breath in.

for safely revisiting the past. If you cannot tolerate what you are feeling right now, opening up the past will only compound the misery and re-traumatize you further.

you are feeling right now. Opening up the past will only compound the misery and re-traumatize you further. We can tolerate a great deal of discomfort as long as we see

We can tolerate a great deal of discomfort as long as we stay conscious of the fact that the body's commotions constantly shift. One moment your chest tightens, but after a few seconds, it feels like it's going to

You should not be surprised if a memory spontaneously arises in which that shoulder was somehow involved. A further step is to observe the interplay between your thoughts and your physical sensation.

One way to think of this process of transformation is to think of mindfulness as a lens, taking the scattered and reactive energies of your mind and focusing them into a cohesion.

detector, the amygdala, and thus decreases reactivity to potential triggers. Number three. Relationships.

gentle holding and rocking, and the assurance that somebody bigger and stronger is taking care of things, so you can safely go to sleep. In order to recover, mind...

and the assurance that somebody bigger and stronger is taking care of things so you can safely go to sleep. In order to recover, mind, body, and brain need to be convinced that it is

shelter in a safe place, and time to sleep. It is critical to communicate with loved ones close and far, and to reunite as soon as possible.

Studies conducted during World War II in England show that children who lived in London during the Blitz and were sent away to the countryside for protection against German bombing raids fared much worse than children who

than children who remained with their parents and endured nights in bomb shelters and frightening images of destroyed buildings and dead people. Traumatized human beings

endured nights in bomb shelters and frightening images of destroyed buildings and dead people. Traumatized human beings recover in the context of relationships.

traumas, in women and children, occur at the hands of their parents or intimate partners. Child abuse, molestation, and domestic violence all are inflicted.

you love. If the people whom you naturally turn to for care and protection terrify or reject you, you learn to shut down and to ignore what you feel.

Your caregivers turn on you. You have to find alternative ways to deal with feeling scared, angry, or frustrated. Managing your terror all by yourself gives rise to another set of problems.

by alienation, disconnection, and explosions. Patients with these histories rarely make the connection between what happened to them long ago and how they currently feel and behave.

regularly, took anabolic steroids, and were strong as oxen. However, in our interviews, they often acted like scared kids. The Hurt Boys deepened their friendship.

still felt helpless. While human contact and attunement are the wellspring of physiological self-regulation, the promise of closeness

You have to find someone you can trust enough to accompany you. Someone who can safely hold your feelings and help you listen to the painful messages from your emotional brain. You need a guide who is not alone.

There may be times, as old feelings from the past are stirred up, when you become suspicious that the therapist resembles someone who once hurt or abused you.

In my experience, patients get better only if they develop deep, positive feelings for their therapists. I also don't think that you can grow and change unless you feel that you have some impact on the person.

Take the time to find out why you do what you do and think what you think. Therapy is a collaborative process, a mutual exploration of your mind.

about why you do what you do and think what you think. Therapy is a collaborative process, a mutual exploration of your.

if they can think of any person they felt safe with while they were growing up. Many of them hold tight to the memory of that one teacher, neighbor, shopkeeper, coach, or minister who showed that he

whether they were lovable and filled with spunk. All of them believe they were, and have some image of what they must have been like before they were hurt. Some people don't remember.

These are the foundations of attachment. Trauma results in a breakdown of attuned physical synchrony. When you enter the waiting room of the PTSD clinic, you can immediately tell the patient.

ignore these physical communications and focus only on the words with which their patients communicate. The healing power of community, as expressed in music and rhythms, was brought

it to hum, while gently swaying back and forth. Slowly, a rhythm emerged. Bit by bit, other women joined in. Soon,

but I regularly incorporate sensory integration experiences and dance in my seminars. Learning to become attuned provides parents and their kids with a visceral experience.

Learning to become attuned provides parents and their kids with a visceral experience of reciprocity. Parent-child interaction therapy, known as parent-child interaction therapy,

therapy, known as PCIT, is an interactive therapy that fosters this, as is SMART, which is an acronym for Sensory Motor Arousal Regulation.

and joy. Improvisation exercises also are a marvelous way to help people connect in joy and exploring. The moment you see a group of grim-faced people break

terrified people to safely experience their sensations and emotions. Medications such as serotonin reuptake blockers, risperidol, and Seroquel increasingly have taken the place

people to deal with their sensory world. However, the most natural way that we humans calm down our distress is by being touched, hugged, and rocked. This helps with excess arousal.

from most therapeutic practices. And you can't fully recover if you don't feel safe in your skin. Therefore, I encourage all my patients to engage in some sort of body work, be it.

I'm not taking a history. I'm not finding out how traumatized a person is or what happened to them. I check in where they are in their body right now. I ask them if there is anything they want me to do.

easy for the client to follow, gently rhythmic. It can be as strong as a handshake. The first place I might touch is their hand and forearm because that's the safest

and forearm, because that's the safest place to touch anybody, the place where they can touch you back. You have to meet their point of resistance, the place that has the most tension.

are holding in their bodies. What does body work do for people? Lisha's reply, just like you can thirst for water, you can thirst for touch.

What does body work do for people? Lisha's reply Just like you can thirst for water you can thirst for touch. It is a comfort to be met confidently, deeply, freely.

to be met confidently, deeply, firmly, gently, responsibly. Mindful touch and movement grounds people and allows them to discover tensions that they may have held for.

no longer even aware of them. When you are touched, you wake up to the part of your body that is being touched. The body is physically restricted when emotions are bound up inside. People's shoulders

They spend enormous energy on holding back their tears or any sound or movement that might betray their inner state. When the physical tension is released, the feelings can be released.

People who are terrified need to get a sense of where their bodies are in space and of their boundaries. Firm and reassuring touch lets them know where those boundaries are, what's outside.

hormones. These are often blamed for subsequent illness and disease. However, stress hormones are meant to give us the strength and endurance to respond to extraordinary conditions.

Nevertheless, everyone has his or her breaking point, and even the best-prepared person may become overwhelmed by the magnitude of the challenge. Helplessness and Immobilization

still are being pumped out, but the actions they're supposed to fuel are thwarted. Eventually, the activation patterns that were meant to promote coping are turned back against the organism.

and now keep fueling the inappropriate fight-or-flight and freeze responses. In order to return to proper functioning, this persistent emergency response must come to an end.

to a baseline state of safety and relaxation from which it can mobilize and take action in response to real danger. My friends and teachers, Pat Ogden and Peter Levine, have each

My friends and teachers, Pat Ogden and Peter Levine, have each developed powerful body-based therapies, sensory motor psychotherapy, and somatic experiments.

to sensations and emotions that overwhelmed them at the time of the trauma. Peter Levine calls this process pendulation, gently moving in and out.

Peter Levine calls this process pendulation, gently moving in and out of accessing internal sensations and traumatic memories.

In this way, patients are helped to gradually expand their window of tolerance. Once patients can tolerate being aware of their trauma-based physical condition, they are able to move on to the next step.

Once patients can tolerate being aware of their trauma-based physical experiences, they are likely to discover powerful physical impulses, like hitting, pushing, or running.

manifest themselves in subtle body movements such as twisting, turning, or backing away. Amplifying these movements and experimenting with ways to modify them begins the process

or backing away. Amplifying these movements and experimenting with ways to modify them begins the process of bringing the incomplete, trauma-related, action-test.

Automatic therapies can help patients to relocate themselves in the present by experiencing that it is safe to move. Feeling the pleasure of taking effective action restores a sense of agency.

great explorer of trauma, wrote about the pleasure of completed action and I regularly observe that pleasure when I practice sensory motor psychotherapy and somatic

pleasure when I practice sensory-motor psychotherapy and somatic experiencing. When patients can physically experience what it would have felt like to fight back or run away. They relax, smile,

like to fight back or run away. They relax, smile, and express a sense of completion. When people are forced to submit to overwhelming power, as is true for most abused children,

When people are forced to submit to overwhelming power, as is true for most abused children, women trapped in domestic violence, and incarcerated men,

abused children, women trapped in domestic violence, and incarcerated men and women. They often survive with resigned compliance. The best way to overcome ingrained

They often survive with resigned compliance. The best way to overcome ingrained patterns of submission is to restore a physical capacity to engage and defend.

In the terms of this book, her executive functions—her frontal lobes—went offline, and she froze. The Model Mugging Program teaches women to recondition.

Okay, guys. I've been looking forward to this moment. Who wants to take me on first?" They ran away. If you're hunched over and too afraid to look around...

consists chiefly of translating it back again in terms of the past. Telling the story is important. Without stories, memory becomes frozen.

Telling the story is important. Without stories, memory becomes frozen. And without memory, you cannot imagine how things can be different. But as we

that the traumatic memories will be laid to rest. There is a reason for that. When people remember an ordinary event, they don't also relive the physical sensation.

There is a reason for that. When people remember an ordinary event, they don't also relive the physical sensations, emotions, images, smells, and smells.

Stan and Uta Lawrence, the accident victims in Chapter 4, show how this happens. When Stan was remembering his horrendous accident, two key areas of his brain went blank.

of time and perspective, which makes it possible to know that, that was then, but I am safe now, and another area that integrates the images, sounds, and sensations of trauma,

and another area that integrates the images, sounds, and sensations of trauma into a coherent story. When those parts of the brain are knocked out, you experience something

It sounds simple, but, as we have seen, reliving trauma reactivates the brain's alarm system and knocks out critical brain areas necessary for integrating the past, making it likely that the brain will be able to function again.

on the traumatic material and not distract themselves with other thoughts or activities. Research has shown that up to 100 minutes of flooding in which anxiety.

Analysis of all the scientific studies of CBT show that it works about as well as being in a supportive therapy relationship. The poorest outcome in exposure treatments occurs in patients who suffer from

Being traumatized is not just an issue of being stuck in the past. It's just as much a problem of not being fully alive in the present. One form of exposure

The problem is that they cannot tolerate being home. Recent studies of Australian combat veterans show that their brains are rewired to be alert for emergencies, at the expense of being focused.

More than virtual reality therapy, traumatized patients need real-world therapy, which helps them to feel as alive when walking through the local hospital.

helping patients become less reactive to certain emotions and sensations. But is this the correct goal? Maybe the issue is not desensitization.

The kid was unfazed, while my heart was racing and I felt an impulse to deck the guy. How much brutality had it taken to numb a child this young to his father's brutality?

Exposure treatment, as currently practiced, rarely works for them. We can only process horrendous experiences if they don't overwhelm us. And that means we have to be prepared.

experiences if they don't overwhelm us, and that means that other approaches are necessary. Drugs to safely access

increases fear, defensiveness, and numbing, as well as helping to access inner experience. They thought MDMA might enable patients to stay within the window of tolerance.

from traditional desensitization techniques, which are about blunting a person's response to past horrors. This is about association and integration.

question. Let's see what works, and only the patient can be the judge of that. On the other hand, if one SSRI does not work, it's worth trying another, because the

processing, EMDR, for patients with PTSD, many of whom were also depressed, EMDR proved to be a more effective antidepressant than Prozac.

in Prozac. I'll return to that subject in Chapter 15. Medicines that target the autonomic nervous system, like propranolol or clonidine, can help to decrease high

fuel of arousal, and thus reduces nightmares, insomnia, and reactivity to trauma triggers. Blocking adrenaline can help to keep the rational brain online.

Using these drugs is sometimes justified, for example, when patients feel completely out of control and unable to sleep, or where other methods have failed. But it's important to keep in mind that these medications—

completely out of control and unable to sleep, or where other methods have failed. But it's important to keep in mind that these medications work by blocking the dopamine system the brain

out lego blocks stamped with the word Risperdal for the waiting rooms of child psychiatrists. Children from low-income families are four times as likely as the privately insured.

end, the distressing feelings in his body, just as he had learned to tolerate and live with his most painful memories of the war. I suggested that he consult a body-worker who had introduced me

of local mental health practitioners. Why CBT? Because behavioral treatment can be broken down into concrete steps and manualized into uniform protocols.

survey of 225 people who had escaped from the Twin Towers. Asked what had been most helpful in overcoming the effects of their experience, the survivors credited acupuncture, massage, and meditation.

and memory went white till the circumstances were humdrum once more. While trauma keeps us dumbfounded, the path out of it is paved with words.

We may think we can control our grief, our terror, or our shame by remaining silent. But naming offers the possibility of a different kind of control.

In contrast, being met by silence and incomprehension kills the spirit. Or as John Bowlby so memorably put it, What cannot be spoken of is not spoken of.

you start using your feelings as signals of problems that require your urgent attention. Ignoring inner reality also eats away at your sense of self.

Ignoring inner reality also eats away at your sense of self, identity, and purpose. Clinical Psychologist, Edna Foge

how patients think about themselves. Symptoms of PTSD often include statements like, I feel dead inside. I will never be able to feel normal emotions

unaware of the need to heal that split. And there was no one, after I returned, to point this out to me. Why did I assume there was only one person inside me? There's a part of me that just loves men.

painful. Death, destruction, and sorrow need to be constantly justified in the absence of some overarching meaning for the suffering. Lack of this overarching

Getting perspective on your terror and sharing it with others can re-establish the feeling that you are a member of the human race. After the Vietnam veterans I treated joined a therapy group where they could share the atrocities.

tactual memory. It enables me to remember that I never contracted my forehead in the act of thinking. Helen's tactual memory, memories based only on touch,

And this was true of my own psychoanalysis. While I talk easily and can tell interesting tales, I quickly realized how difficult it was to feel my feelings deeply and simultaneously.

focus on reliving old scenes in my mind's eye and let myself feel what I had felt back then. Or, I could tell my analyst logically and coherently what had transpired.

approval. Since then, neuroscience research has shown that we possess two distinct forms of self-awareness. One that keeps track of the self across time, and one

creates connections among experiences, and assembles them into a coherent story. This system is rooted in language. Our narratives change with the telling, as our perspective changes.

we incorporate new input. The other system, moment-to-moment self-awareness, is based primarily in physical sensations, but if we feel safe and are not rushed,

based primarily in physical sensations, but if we feel safe and are not rushed, we can find words to communicate that experience as well. These two ways of knowing

of knowing are localized in different parts of the brain that are largely disconnected from each other. Only the system devoted to self-awareness, which is based in the medial prefrontal cortex, can change the emotion.

many patients tell me about the happy families they grew up in while their bodies are slumped over and their voices sound anxious and uptight. One system creates a story for public consumption.

and told did not explain why she had fallen apart after losing her job. So I asked her what it had been like for that five-year-old girl to be told that something was wrong with her brain. That forced her to check

So, I asked her what it had been like for that five-year-old girl to be told that something was wrong with her brain. That forced her to check in with herself, as she had no ready-made script for that question.

So, I asked her what it had been like for that five-year-old girl to be told that something was wrong with her brain, and that forced her to check in with herself, as she had no ready-made script for that question.

I asked her what it had been like for that five-year-old girl to be told that something was wrong with her brain. That forced her to check in with herself, as she had no ready-made script for that question.

deserve that. She should have been supported. Somebody should have looked after her. Then she shifted again, and proudly told me about her accomplishments. How much she'd achieved.

Language evolved primarily to share things out there, not to communicate our inner feelings, our interiority. Again, the language center of the brain is about as far removed from the

center of the brain is about as far removed from the center of experiencing oneself as is geographically possible. Most of us are better at describing someone else than we are describing ourselves.

He was eight when his father deserted the family. I am likely to stop and ask him to check in with himself. What happens inside when he tells me about the boy who never saw his father again?

and listen to your heartbreak, when you follow the interoceptive pathways to your innermost recesses, things begin to change.

Things begin to change. Writing to yourself. There are other ways to access your inner world of feelings.

If you ask your editor to leave you alone for a while, things will come out that you had no idea were there. You are free to go into a sort of a trance state in which your pen or keyboard

or keyboard, seems to channel whatever bubbles up from inside. You can connect those self-observing and narrative parts of your brain without worrying about the reception you'll get.

You can connect those self-observing and narrative parts of your brain without worrying about the reception you'll get. In the practice called free-writing...

In the practice called free-riding, you can use any object as your own personal Rorschach test for entering a stream of associations. Simply ride the first

Of the 200 participants, 65 wrote about a childhood trauma. Although the death of a family member was the most frequent topic, 22% of the women and 10% of the men

cancer, high blood pressure, ulcers, flu, headaches, and earaches. And those who reported a traumatic sexual experience in childhood had been hospitalized.

I had to think and resolve past experiences. One result of the experiment was peace of mind. To have to write about emotions and feelings helped me understand how I felt and why.

how I felt and why. In a subsequent study, Pennebaker asked half of a group of 72 students to talk into a tape recorder about the most traumatic experience of their lives.

In a subsequent study, Pennebaker asked half of a group of 72 students to talk into a tape recorder about the most traumatic experience of their lives. The other half discussed their plans for the rest of the day.

traumatic experience of their lives. The other half discussed their plans for the rest of the day. As they spoke, researchers monitored their physiological reactions.

either about a personal trauma or a superficial topic. Again, those who wrote about personal traumas had fewer visits to the Student Health Center and their improved

killer cells and other immune markers in the blood. This effect was most obvious directly after the experiment, but it could still be detected six weeks later. Writing experiments

This effect was most obvious directly after the experiment, but it could still be detected six weeks later. Writing experiments from around the world, with great school students, nursing home residents...

students, nursing home residents, medical students, maximum security prisoners, arthritis sufferers, new mothers, and rape victims consistently show that writing about

Another aspect of Pennebaker's studies caught my attention. When his subjects talked about intimate or difficult issues, they often changed their tone of voice and speaking style.

They often changed their tone of voice and speaking style. The differences were so striking that Pennebaker wondered if he had mixed up his tapes. For example, one woman described her

The differences were so striking that Pennebaker wondered if he had mixed up his tapes. For example, one woman described her plans for the day in a childlike, high-pitched voice.

clinical practice, and we see them often in individuals with trauma histories. Patients activate distinctly different emotional and physiological states as they move

with trauma histories. Patients activate distinctly different emotional and physiological states as they move from one topic to another.

Patients activate distinctly different emotional and physiological states as they move from one topic to another. Switching manifests not only

Patients activate distinctly different emotional and physiological states as they move from one topic to another. Switching manifests not only as remarkable,

been silenced, they will transmit their cries for help, not by talking, but by acting, with suicide attempts, depression, and rage attacks. As we

for help, not by talking, but by acting, with suicide attempts, depression, and rage attacks. As we'll see in chapter 17, they will

do the research necessary to establish their value scientifically.

focused on PTSD symptoms, as opposed to general health, have been disappointing. When I discussed this with Pennebaker, he cautioned me that most writing studies of PTSD patients have been done

patients have been done in group settings where participants were expected to share their stories. He reiterated the point I've made previously, that the object of writing is to write to yourself.

participants were expected to share their stories. He reiterated the point I've made previously, that the object of writing is to write to yourself, to let yourself know

reiterated the point I've made previously, that the object of writing is to write to yourself, to let yourself know what you have been trying to avoid.

No one is very interested in the bad news they have to report. What listener wants to be torn and shaken when he doesn't have to be? We have made unspeakable mean indescribable.

Friends and family can lose patience with people who get stuck in their grief or hurt. This is one reason why trauma victims often withdraw and why their stories become rote narratives.

often withdraw, and why their stories become rote narratives, edited into a form least likely to provoke rejection. It is an enormous challenge to find safe places to express the pain.

We start by establishing inner islands of safety within the body. This means helping patients identify parts of the body, postures, or movements where they can ground themselves

body, postures, or movements where they can ground themselves whenever they feel stuck, terrified, or enraged. These parts usually lie outside the reach of the vagus nerve, which carries

movements where they can ground themselves whenever they feel stuck, terrified, or enraged. These parts usually lie outside the reach of the vagus nerve, which carries the messages of panic to the chest.

their lightness and warmth and flexibility. Later if I see her chest tighten and her breath almost disappear, I can stop her and ask her to focus on her hands and move them.

I can stop her and ask her to focus on her hands and move them so that she can feel herself as separate from the trauma. Or, I might ask her to focus on her out-breath.

Or I might ask her to focus on her out breath and notice how she can change it, or ask her to lift her arms up and down with each breath, a qigong movement.

patient who is collapsing into silence to see what happens when he sits up straight. Some patients discover their own islands of safety. They begin to get that they can create body sensations to

islands of safety, they begin to get that they can create body sensations to counterbalance feeling out of control. This sets the stage for trauma resolution.

sensations to counterbalance feeling out of control. This sets the stage for trauma resolution, pendulating between states of exploration and safety, between language and body.

feeling out of control. This sets the stage for trauma resolution, pendulating between states of exploration and safety, between language and body, between remembering the past and the future.

averaged three or four. Normal subjects hesitated when they saw threatening words like blood, wound, or rape. Like Farland's peaches.

baby was so selfish? Would she have benefited from a fact sheet on child development or an explanation of the concept of altruism?

parts of herself, the parts expressed by her terror of dependence. There is no question traumatized people have irrational thoughts.

interferes with the proper functioning of brain areas that manage and interpret experience. A robust sense of self, one that allows a person to state confidently, this is what I think and feel,

Each part of the brain integrates and interprets the input from the internal organs, including our muscles, joints, and balance, or proprioceptive system, to generate the sense of being embodied.

organs, including our muscles, joints, and balance, or proprioceptive system, to generate the sense of being embodied. The insula can transmit signals to the amygdala.

Being constantly assaulted by, but consciously cut off from, the origin of bodily sensations, produces alexithymia, not being able to sense and communicate.

on with you. Only by getting in touch with your body, by connecting viscerally with yourself, can you regain a sense of who you are, your priorities and values.

Connecting viscerally with yourself, can you regain a sense of who you are, your priorities, and values? Alexithymia, dissociation, and shutdown, all involved.

experiences, the feeling you're watching yourself from far away. In other words, trauma makes people feel like either somebody else or like

some body else, or like no body. In order to overcome trauma, you need to help get back in touch with your body, with yours.

There is no question that language is essential. Our sense of self depends on being able to organize our memories into a coherent whole. This requires well-functioning connections.

Our sense of self depends on being able to organize our memories into a coherent whole. This requires well-functioning connections between the conscious brain and the self-system of the body.

The full story can be told only after those structures are repaired and after the groundwork has been laid. After nobody becomes somebody.

She was convinced it had been her fault. She loved her daddy, she explained, and she must have been so seductive that he could not control himself. Listening to her, I thought,

and she must have been so seductive that he could not control himself. Listening to her, I thought, she might not blame her father, but she sure is blaming just about everybody else, including her priest.

is blaming just about everybody else, including her previous therapists, for not helping her get better. Like many trauma survivors, she told one story with words and another in her

Like many scientific advances, EMDR originated with a chance observation. One day in 1987, psychologist Francine Shapiro was walking down the street.

when people told me their trauma stories. Again, I had to agree with him. Then he said, you know, Bessel, maybe you need to learn to put your voyeuristic tendencies on hold. If it's important for you to hear

and ever since have enjoyed repeating it to my students. I left my EMDR training preoccupied with three issues that fascinate me to this day. One, EMDR loosens up

This seems to help them put the traumatic experience into a larger context or perspective. 2. People may be able to heal from trauma without talking about it. EMDR enables them to observe their emotions.

I have done EMDR with patients who spoke Swahili, Mandarin, and Breton, all languages in which I can say only, notice that, le qu'il est.

treatment. After only 3 EMDR sessions, 8 of the 12 had shown a significant decrease in their PTSD scores. On their scans, we could see a sharp increase in prefrontal lobe activation after 8 sessions.

8 of the 12 had shown a significant decrease in their PTSD scores. On their scans, we could see a sharp increase in prefrontal lobe activation after treatment, as well as much more activity in the frontal lobe.

experienced their trauma. One man reported, I remember it as though it was a real memory, but it was more distant. Typically, I drowned

I had the feeling that I was in control. A woman told us, before I felt each and every step of it. Now, it's like a whole instead of fragments.

brings about a 30% to 42% improvement. When drugs work, they add an additional 5% to 15%. However, the patients on EMDR did substantially.

compared with 1 in 10 of the Prozac group. But the real difference occurred over time. When we interviewed our subjects eight months later, 60% of those who had received EMDR

Sixty percent of those who had received EMDR scored as being completely cured. As the great psychiatrist Milton Erickson said, once you kick the log, the river will

scored as being completely cured. As the great psychiatrist Milton Erickson said, once you kick the log, the river will start flowing.

Another key finding of our study, adults with histories of childhood trauma responded very differently to EMDR from those who were traumatized as adults.

At the end of eight weeks, almost half of the adult-onset group that received EMDR scored as completely cured, while only 9% of the child-abuse group showed such.

Veterans Affairs. Is EMDR a form of exposure therapy? Some psychologists have hypothesized that EMDR

system in the brain works. This omission can lead to misguided approaches to treatment. In contrast to phobias, such as spider phobia, which is based on a specific irrational fear

In contrast to phobias, such as spider phobia, which is based on a specific irrational fear, post-traumatic stress is the result of a fundamental reorganization of the central nervous system.

Post-traumatic stress is the result of a fundamental reorganization of the central nervous system based on having experienced an actual threat of annihilation, or seeing someone die.

annihilation, or seeing someone else being annihilated, which reorganizes self-experience as helpless, and the interpretation of reality, the entire world.

they get lower scores on their PTSD ratings. However, as far as we know, simply exposing someone to the old trauma does not integrate the memory into the overall context of their life.

role in mood regulation. As the article in Dreaming pointed out, the eyes move rapidly back and forth in REM sleep, just as they do in EMDR.

the more likely we are to become depressed. Of course, PTSD is notoriously associated with disturbed sleep, and self-medication with alcohol or drugs further disrupts sleep.

noticed this phenomenon, but thought that it was irrelevant to understanding PTSD. Today we know that both deep sleep and REM sleep play important roles in how memories change.

Both deep sleep and REM sleep play important roles in how memories change over time. The sleeping brain reshapes memory by increasing the imprint of emotionally relevant information

clear while we are awake and integrate it into the larger memory system. Dreams keep replaying, recombining, and reintegrating.

recombining, and reintegrating pieces of old memories for months and even years. They constantly update the subterranean realities that determine what our waking mind

mind pays attention to. And perhaps most relevant to EMDR, in REM sleep, we activate more distant associations than in either non-REM sleep or the normal REM sleep.

Thief for wrong. They also solve simple anagrams more easily after REM sleep. This shift toward activation of distant associations could explain

and their colleagues thus discover that dreams help to forge new relationships between apparently unrelated memories. Seeing novel connections is the cardinal feature of creativity.

trauma resolution. The basic EMDR instruction, hold that image in your mind and just watch my fingers moving back and forth, may very well reproduce what I'm doing.

There is a brand new capacity to warmly love the self. We experience a new quality of authenticity in our caring, which redirects our attention to our health, our diets, our energy, and our well-being.

door, I encouraged her to take slightly deeper breaths. I breathed with her and asked her to follow my example, gently raising my arms from my sides as she did.

I breathed with her and asked her to follow my example, gently raising my arms from my sides as she inhaled and lowering them as she exhaled, a qigong technique.

She used every technique that I had learned over the years, like breathing with a focus on the out-breath, which activates the relaxing parasympathetic nervous system. I also taught her to use her fingers to tapestry.

I also taught her to use her fingers to tap a sequence of acupressure points on various parts of her body, a practice often taught under the name EFT.

parts of her body, a practice often taught under the name EFT, the acronym for Emotional Freedom Technique, which has been shown to help patients stay within the window of their

about seeing someone she loved with the terror of being molested. Small children are particularly adept at compartmentalizing experience, so that a nanny's natural love for her

in separate states of consciousness. As an adult Annie blamed herself for her abuse, because she believed that the loving, excited little girl she once was had led her father on, that she had brought them

once was, had led her father on, that she had brought the molestation upon herself. Her rational mind told her this was nonsense, but this belief emanated from deep within her

serially obese or anorexic or addicted to exercise or work. At least half of all traumatized people try to dull their intolerable inner world with drugs or alcohol.

traumatized people try to dull their intolerable inner world with drugs or alcohol. The flip side of numbing is sensation-seeking. Many people cut themselves to make the numbing go away.

chronically angry or scared, constant muscle tension ultimately leads to spasms, back pain, migraine headaches, fibromyalgia, and other forms of chronic pain.

with trauma. The first two years of my therapy with Annie focused on helping her learn to tolerate her physical sensations for what they were, just sensations in the present.

her physical sensations for what they were, just sensations in the present, with a beginning, a middle, and an end. We worked on helping her stay calm enough to notice what she felt without judgment.

That is how my trauma center colleagues and I stumbled upon yoga. Finding Our Way to Yoga Bottom-Up Regulation

Our involvement with yoga started in 1998 when Jim Hopper and I first heard about a new biological marker, heart rate variability or HRV, that had

The autonomic nervous system is our brain's most elementary survival system. It's two branches regulating arousal throughout the body. Roughly speaking, the sympathetic nervous system, the SNN,

SNS uses chemicals like adrenaline to fuel the body and brain to take action, while the parasympathetic nervous system, the PNS, uses acetylcholine.

wound healing, and sleep and dream cycles. When we're at our best, these two systems work closely together to keep us in an optimal state of engagement with our environment.

with ourselves. Heart rate variability measures the relative balance between the sympathetic and the parasympathetic systems. When we inhale, we stimulate the SNA.

sympathetic systems. When we inhale, we stimulate the SNS, which results in an increase in heart rate. Exhalations stimulate the PNS, which decreases how fast the heart beats.

a measure of basic well-being. Why is HRV important? When our autonomic nervous system is well-balanced, we have a reasonable degree of control over our autonomic nervous system.

enabling us to calmly assess what's going on when we feel insulted or left out. Effective arousal modulation gives us control over our impulses and emotions.

Individuals with poorly modulated autonomic nervous systems are easily thrown off balance, both mentally and physically. Since the autonomic nervous system organizes arousal in both body and brain, poor A.R.S. is not an option.

both mentally and physically. Since the autonomic nervous system organizes arousal in both body and brain, poor HRV, that is a lack of fluctuation in heart rate in response to breathing.

on thinking and feeling, but also on how the body responds to stress. Lack of coherence between breathing and heart rate makes people vulnerable to a variety of physical illnesses, such as heart disease,

while little monitors attached to their earlobes picked up their pulse. After we tested about 60 subjects, it became clear that people with PTSD have unusually low heart rate.

confirmed that yet another brain regulatory system was not functioning as it should. Failure to keep this system in balance is one explanation why traumatized people like Annie are so vulnerable.

any of a number of reasonably priced handheld devices that train people to slow their breathing and synchronize it with their heart rate, resulting in a state of cardiac coherence.

for them, as it has been for the women in our studies. All yoga programs consist of a combination of breathing practices known as Pranayama.

consists of a combination of breathing practices, known as pranayama, stretches or postures, known as asanas, and meditation.

The emphasis is not on getting the poses right, but on helping the participants notice which muscles are active at different times. The sequences are designed to create a rhythm between 10 and 20 beats.

but on helping the participants notice which muscles are active at different times. The sequences are designed to create a rhythm between tension and relaxation, something we highly recommend.

class I came home and slept for four hours. This week I tried doing yoga at home and the words came to me, your body has things to say. I said back to myself,

music, touch, and light, which imbue life with value. Yoga turned out to be a terrific way to regain a relationship with the interior world, and with it, with it, with it.

If you are not aware of what your body needs, you can't take care of it. If you don't feel hunger, you can't nourish yourself. If you mistake anxiety for hunger, you may eat too much.

You can't take care of it. If you don't feel hunger, you can't nourish yourself. If you mistake anxiety for hunger, you may eat too much. And if you can't feel when you're satiated, you'll keep eating.

relieve the tension in your shoulder, while focusing on your exhalations produce a sense of calm. Simply noticing what you feel fosters emotional regulation and it helps

Trauma makes you feel as if you are stuck forever in a helpless state of horror. In yoga, you learn that sensations rise to a peak and then fall.

breathing into your pelvis. I felt a beginning of panic, especially in the breathing pose, like, oh no, that's not a part of my body I want to feel. But then I was able to stop myself and just

Alice, meet them at the door laughing and invite them in. Be grateful for whoever comes, because each has been sent as a guide from beyond.

but particularly to traumatized people who had to resort to extreme measures in order to survive. Exploring, even befriending, those parts is an important component.

It's much more productive to see aggression or depression, arrogance or passivity, as learned behaviors. Somewhere along the line, the patient came to believe that he or she can survive

Like traumatic memories that keep intruding until they are laid to rest, traumatic adaptations continue until the human organism feels safe and integrates all the parts of itself that are stuck in fighting or warding off the trauma.

and pay, the absence of a loving relationship with their own bodies, minds, and souls. Coping takes its toll. For many children, it's safer to hate themselves than to risk their

minds, and souls. Coping takes its toll. For many children, it's safer to hate themselves than to risk their relationship with their caregivers by expressing anger or by running away.

some aspects of their lives, face another even greater challenge, reconfiguring a brain-mind system that was constructed to cope with the worst.

worst. Just as we need to revisit traumatic memories in order to integrate them, we need to revisit the parts of ourselves that developed the defensive habits that helped us to survive.

The mind is a mosaic. We all have parts. Right now, a part of us is a part of us. We all have parts. Right now, a part of us is a part of us.

has a characteristic tone of voice, vocabulary, and body posture, so different from yesterday when you shared pictures of your kids. Parts are not just feelings, but distinct ways of being.

with their own beliefs, agendas, and roles in the overall ecology of our lives. How well we get along with ourselves depends largely on our internal leadership skills, how well we listen.

different parts, make sure they feel taken care of, and keep them from sabotaging one another. Parts often come across as absolutes when in fact they represent only one element in a complex

Lansky's family metaphor truly came to life for me and offered a systematic way to work with the split-off parts that result from trauma. At the core of IFS is the notion that the mind of each of us is

The parts form a network or system in which change in any one part will affect all the others. The IFS model helped me realize that dissociation occurs on a continuum.

and parts of the self become polarized and go to war with one another. Self-loathing coexists and fights with grandiosity. Loving care with hatred, numbing and passivity.

emotions that hijack them out of their naturally valuable state. For example, we all have parts that are childlike and fun. When we are abused, these are the parts that

and betrayal of abuse. This burden makes them toxic, parts of ourselves that we need to deny at all costs because they are locked away inside.

because they are locked away inside. IFS calls them the exiles. At this point, other parts organize to protect the internal family from the exiles.

At this point, other parts organize to protect the internal family from the exiles. These protectors keep the toxic parts away, but in doing so, they take on some of the heat. In the meantime, they keep the toxic parts away, but in doing so, they take on some of

Critical and perfectionistic managers can make sure we never get close to anyone or drive us to be relentlessly productive. Another group of protectors, with

Children who act out their pain rather than locking it down are often diagnosed with oppositional defiant behavior, attachment disorder,

leads to treatments that are ineffective, at best, and harmful, at worst. As they grow up, their parts do not spontaneously integrate into a coherent personality, but continue to grow.

are out may be entirely unaware of the other parts of the system. Most of the men I evaluated with regard to their childhood molestation by Catholic priests took anabolic

or fill holes in your psyche. The first step in this collaboration is to assure the internal system that all parts are welcome and that all of them

of them, even those that are suicidal or destructive, were formed in an attempt to protect the self-system, no matter how much they now seem to threaten it.

self-leadership. IFS recognizes that the cultivation of mindful self-leadership is the foundation for healing from trauma. Mindfulness not only makes it possible to heal from trauma, but it also makes it possible to heal from trauma.

that takes all the parts into account. As Richard Schwartz explains, the internal system of an abuse victim differs from the non-abuse system with regard to the

As Richard Schwartz explains,

of an abuse victim differs from the non-abuse system with regard to the consistent absence of effective leadership, the extreme rules under which the parts function, and the absence of any consistent balance or harmony.

with regard to the consistent absence of effective leadership, the extreme rules under which the parts function, and the absence of any consistent balance or harmony. Typically, the parts operate around

which the parts function and the absence of any consistent balance or harmony. Typically, the parts operate around outdated assumptions and beliefs derived from the childhood abuse. Believing, for example,

in charge. IFS calls this blending, a condition in which the self identifies with a part as in I want to kill myself or I hate you.

with a part, as in I want to kill myself or I hate you. Notice the difference from a part of me wishes that I were dead, or a part of me triggers a part of me wants to

dead," or, "'A part of me triggers when you do that and makes me want to kill you.'" Schwartz makes two assertions that extend the concept of mindfulness into the realm of active leadership.

Schwartz makes two assertions that extend the concept of mindfulness into the realm of active leadership. The first is that this self does not need to be cultivated or developed. Beneath the surface of the protective part

The second assumption is that, rather than being a passive observer, this mindful self can help reorganize the inner system and communicate with the parts in ways that help those parts trust.

communicate with the parts in ways that help those parts trust that there is someone inside who can handle things. Again, neuroscience research shows that this is not just

someone inside who can handle things. Again, neuroscience research shows that this is not just a metaphor. Mindfulness increases activation of the medial prefrontal cortex.

Getting to know the internal landscape. The task of the therapist is to help patients separate this confusing blend.

many of these parts, but identifying them makes them less intimidating or overwhelming. The next step is to encourage patients to simply ask each protective part as it emerges to

The next step is to encourage patients to simply ask each protective part, as it emerges, to stand back temporarily, so that we can see what it is protecting.

perspective of self, they can begin constructive inter-dialogues with their parts. Patients are asked to identify the part involved in the current problem.

a combat marine, or a member of a street gang. Next, the therapist asks, how do you feel toward that sad, vengeful, terrified part of you?

The therapist asks, how do you feel toward that sad, vengeful, terrified part of you? This sets the stage for mindful self-observation by separating the you from the

observation by separating the you from the part in question. If the patient has an extreme response like, I hate it, the therapist knows that there is another protective

I hate it, the therapist knows that there is another protective part blended with self. He or she might then ask, see if the part that hates it would step back.

by inquiring how odd it is, and how it came to feel the way it does. Once a patient manifests a critical mass of self, this kind of dialogue begins to take place.

comments or ask questions like, what do you say to the part about that? Or, where do you want to go now? Or, what feels like the right next step?

hurt again. I'd probably let her down, as so many people had before. She knew that for therapy to work, she'd have to make herself vulnerable, so she had to find out if I could tolerate her anger.

She knew that for therapy to work, she'd have to make herself vulnerable, so she had to find out if I could tolerate her anger, fear, and sorrow. I realized that the only way to help her was to help her.

and to access herself. Joan responded that she hated the critic because it reminded her of her mother. When I asked her what that critical part might be protecting, her anger subsided.

do anything right. The critic was obviously a manager. Not only was it protecting Joan from me, it was trying to pre-empt her mother's criticism.

obviously a manager. Not only was it protecting Joan from me, it was trying to preempt her mother's criticism. Over the next few weeks, Joan told me that she had been sexually molested.

If, as a therapist, teacher, or mentor, you try to fill the holes of early deprivation, you come up against the fact that you are the wrong person at the wrong time and the wrong time.

through tantrums, a promiscuous adolescent part, a suicidal part, an obsessive manager, a prissy moralist, and so on. As usual, we may

a suicidal part, an obsessive manager, a prissy moralist, and so on. As usual, we met the managers first. Their job

Some managers may be aggressive, like Jones' critic, while others are perfectionistic, or reserved, careful not to draw too much attention to themselves.

Eating disorders are bizarre sexual practices. Gradually, Joan started to realize that it is normal to simultaneously experience conflicting feelings or thoughts.

believing that hate consumed her entire being, she learned that only a part of her felt paralyzed by it. However, after a negative evaluation at work, Joan went into a tailspin, berating

thought would happen if they stepped back. Joan answered, people will hate me and I will be all alone and out in the street. This was followed by a memory.

PUTTING OUT THE FLAMES The following week, Joan missed her appointment. We had triggered her exiles, and her firefighters went on a rampage.

she refused to talk to her husband and fell asleep in the den. The next morning, she acted as if nothing had happened. Firefighters will do anything to make emotional pain go away.

sharing the task of keeping the exiles locked up. They are the opposite of managers. Managers are all about staying in control, while firefighters will destroy the house in order to

to remember that, at their core, firefighters are also desperately trying to protect the system. Unlike managers, who are usually superficially cooperative during therapy, firefighters don't hold back.

trying to protect the system. Unlike managers, who are usually superficially cooperative during therapy, firefighters don't hold back. They hurl insults and storm out of the room.

cooperative during therapy. Firefighters don't hold back. They hurl insults and storm out of the room. Firefighters are frantic, and if you ask them what would happen if they stopped doing their job?

extreme numbing, and they offend both the reasonableness of the managers and the bravado of the firefighters. Like most incest survivors, Joan hated her exiles.

We are nothing but that rejected, weak, unloved, and abandoned child. The self becomes blended with the exiles, and every possible alternative for our life is eclipsed.

The self becomes blended with the exiles, and every possible alternative for our life is eclipsed. Then, as Schwartz points out, we see ourselves and the world through their eyes and believe

and every possible alternative for our life is eclipsed. Then, as Schwartz points out, we see ourselves and the world through their eyes and believe it is the world. In this state, it won't occur to us.

and believe it is the world. In this state, it won't occur to us that we have been hijacked. Keeping the exiles locked up, however, stamps out not only memories and emotions.

stamps out not only memories and emotions, but also the parts that hold them, the parts that were hurt the most by the trauma. In Schwartz's words, usually those are

the parts that were hurt the most by the trauma. In Schwartz's words, usually those are your most sensitive, creative, intimacy-loving, lively, playful, and innocent.

those are your most sensitive, creative, intimacy-loving, lively, playful, and innocent parts. By exiling them when they get hurt, they suffer a double whammy. The insult of your rejection is

I invited her to ask Brian to meet with us, and she was present for eight sessions before he began to see me individually. Schwartz observes that IFS can help family members.

I witnessed this first-hand with Joan and Brian. Brian was initially quite proud of having put up with Joan's behavior for so long. Feeling that she really needed him had kept him from even considering divorce.

purpose, and a way of dealing with his own terror. Finally, Brian was ready to meet his exile, the scared, essentially motherless child, who had no one to care for him.

pain or disability, unless they were totally overwhelmed. Asked how they were feeling, they almost always replied, I'm fine. Their stoic parts clearly helped them cope.

managers who told them to grin and bear it because no one wanted to hear about their pain anyway. Then, as they asked the stoic parts to step back, they started to acknowledge the angry part.

They started to acknowledge the angry part, that wanted to yell and wreak havoc. The part that wanted to stay in bed all the time. And the exile who felt worthless because she was not.

that wanted to yell and wreak havoc, the part that wanted to stay in bed all the time, and the exile who felt worthless because she wasn't allowed to talk.

all the time, and the exile who felt worthless because she wasn't allowed to talk. It emerged that, as children, nearly all of them were supposed to be seen and

While Peter's toughness and his love for precision appealed to me, I couldn't help but wonder if we would discover something I'd seen all too often. That internal managers who are obsessed

to me. I couldn't help but wonder if we would discover something I'd seen all too often. That internal managers who are obsessed with power are usually created as a

and his wife, that he wanted to work things out. At our next session, I asked him to let his body relax, close his eyes, focus his attention inside.

and that this was one of them. He was silent for perhaps a minute before he whispered, I would get hurt. I urged him to ask the critic what that meant.

He was silent for perhaps a minute before he whispered, I would get hurt. I urged him to ask the critic what that meant. Still with his eyes closed, Peter replied,

if you criticize others, they don't dare to hurt you. Then, if you are perfect, nobody can criticize you." I asked him to think.

We went inside again and identified the part that was terrified of abandonment. Once he was in mindful self-state, I urged him to ask that terrified boy to show him the burdens he was carrying.

was carrying. Again, his first reaction was disgust at the boy's weakness. But after I asked him to get that part to step back, he saw an image of himself as a young boy in his parents' house, alone in his room.

scene for several minutes, weeping silently through most of it. I asked him if the boy had told him everything he wanted him to know. No, there were other scenes, like running to him

couldn't have done any better than they had, there being Holocaust survivors and all that implied. Again, I suggested he find the protective parts that were interrupting the witnessing of the boy's pain.

holocaust survivors and all that implied. Again, I suggested he find the protective parts that were interrupting the witnessing of the boy's pain and request that they move temporarily.

headaches. One day he told me that he'd spent his adulthood trying to let go of his past, and he remarked how ironic it was that he had to get closer to it in order to let it go.

filling in the holes, creating structures. The greatest discovery of my generation is that human beings can alter their lives by altering their attitude.

construct those implicit maps. But how? How can we help people become viscerally acquainted with feelings that were lacking early in their lives?

confidence. He told me that he had found a way of fundamentally changing people's relationship to their core, somatic selves. His enthusiasm was infectious, but I

A witness can see how crestfallen you are when you talk about your father deserting the family. I was impressed by how carefully he tracked subtle shifts in body posture, facial expression, tone of voice, and

cry, he observed that nobody should have to bear so much pain all by herself, and he asked if she would like to choose someone to sit next to her. He called this a contact person.

physical movements. According to recent research, up to 90% of human communication occurs in the non-verbal right hemisphere realm, and this is where Pesso's work seemed

of the protagonist's past. As the narratives unfolded, group participants were asked to play the roles of significant people in the protagonist's lives, such as parents and other family members.

of my stern, Calvinistic parents from the time I was a little boy. My chest felt tight, and I'm sure that my voice sounded even tighter. I couldn't deny what my spatial brain was revealing.

I liked Al and was curious about his method, so I hesitantly agreed. He then interposed his body directly between me and the couch and lamp, making them disappear from my line of sight.

you to feel what you felt back then, to visualize what you saw, and to say what you could not say when it actually happened. It's as if you could go back into the movie of your life

participant, you can lose yourself in a scene in a way you cannot when you simply tell a story, and as you take charge of representing the reality of your experience, the witness keeps you company, reflecting the

simulated experiences of growing up in an attuned, affectionate setting, where you are protected from harm. Structures do not erase bad memories.

Structures do not erase bad memories, or even neutralize them the way EMDR does. Instead, a structure offers fresh options, an alternative memory in which your

feel anything in my body and my mind is blank." Mirroring her inner tension, I replied, a witness can see how worried you are that your mind is blank and you don't feel anything after

you are that your mind is blank, and you don't feel anything after volunteering to do a structure, is that right?" Yes, she answered, sounding slightly relieved.

after volunteering to do a structure, is that right?" Yes, she answered, sounding slightly relieved. The witness figure enters the structure at the very beginning and takes

Being validated by feeling heard and seen is a precondition for feeling safe, which is critical when we explore the dangerous territory of trauma.

which is critical when we explore the dangerous territory of trauma and abandonment. A neuroimaging study has shown that when people hear a statement that mirrors their inner state, they are more likely to react. The study found that when people hear a statement that mirrors their inner state,

me to be up here. I reflected, a witness can see how uncomfortable you feel pushing yourself to be here. And she nodded, slightly straightening her spine, signaling that she felt understood.

were a little girl, which he repeated. Note that this work is not about improvisation, but about accurately enacting the dialogue and directions provided by the witness and protagonist.

about 12 feet away, slightly to her right, and facing away from her. We were beginning to create the tableau, and every time I conduct a structure, I'm impressed by how precise

when he berated her. Maria described her mother as loving and warm. She could not have survived without her. She would always be there to comfort Maria after her father lashed out at her.

as loving and warm. She could not have survived without her. She would always be there to comfort Maria after her father lashed out at her, but she didn't do anything to protect her children from her father's wrath.

survived without her. She would always be there to comfort Maria after her father lashed out at her, but she didn't do anything to protect her children from her father's rage. I think my mom had a lot

My breath is free. I have a subtle energetic dance in my body now. Sweet. A witness can see how delighted you are when you hear your mother saying that she's not taking this shit from you.

and beamed. My healthy mom and dad, she exclaimed. I responded, allow yourself to feel that joy as you look at an ideal dad who would have cared for you.

she exclaimed. I responded, allow yourself to feel that joy as you look at an ideal dad who would have cared for you. Maria cried, it's beautiful and through

under ideal circumstances, as if we even know what ideal circumstances are. As my late friend David Cervan Schreiber once said, Every life is difficult in its own way.

once said, every life is difficult in its own way. But we do know that in order to become self-confident and capable adults, it helps enormously to have grown up with steady and predictable pace.

rage that will take a great deal of energy to contain. Our relationships will suffer as well. The more early pain and deprivation we have experienced, the more likely

Having a sensory experience of feeling treasured and protected as a three-year-old in the trance-like container of a structure allows people to re-script their inner experience, as in

in the translite container of a structure allows people to re-script their inner experience as in I can spontaneously interact with other people without having to

people to remain stuck in interpreting the present in light of an unchanging past. The scene you re-create in a structure may or may not be precisely what happened, but it represents the present.

Mark says, and his father married the aunt. Mark was not invited to either the funeral or the wedding. Secrets like these become inner toxins.

sister, but who helped support their isolated immigrant family, and the ideal mother, who kept her husband's interest and devotion, and so did not die of heartbreak. Mark ended the

not die of heartbreak. Mark ended the structure quietly surveying the scene he had created, with a contented smile on his face. For the remainder of the workshop, Mark was an open...

Like the model mugging classes that I discussed in Chapter 13, the structures in psychomotor therapy hold out the possibility of forming virtual memories that live side-by-side with the painful

Lectures in psychomotor therapy hold out the possibility of forming virtual memories that live side-by-side with the painful realities of the past, and provide sensory experiences of feeling seen, cradled, and

point of time?—Nathaniel Hawthorne The faculty of voluntarily bringing back a wandering attention, over and over again, is

The faculty of voluntarily bringing back a wandering attention, over and over again, is the very root of the judgment, character, and will.

Berger discovered that different brainwave patterns reflected different mental activities. For example, trying to solve a math problem resulted in bursts at a moderately fast frequency band, known as a pulse.

had slower-than-normal waves in their frontal lobes. This finding has been reproduced innumerable times since then, and in 2013, slow-wave prefrontal activity was certified.

innumerable times since then, and in 2013, slow-wave prefrontal activity was certified by the Food and Drug Administration as a biomarker for ADHD.

have poor executive functioning. Their rational brains lack proper control over their emotional brains, which also occurs when abuse and trauma have made the emotional centers hyper alert.

and chairs. None of the images was related to trauma. In the normal group, key parts of the brain work together to produce a coherent pattern of filtering, focus, and focus.

together to produce a coherent pattern of filtering, focus, and analysis. In contrast, the brain waves of traumatized subjects were more loosely coordinated and failed to come together.

for understanding day-to-day information processing. These brainwave patterns could explain why so many traumatized people have trouble learning from experience.

full attention to what is going on in the present moment. Sandy MacFarlane's study reminded me of what Pierre Genet had said back in 1889.

which dealt with the experiences of soldiers in Iraq, I immediately recalled Sandy's study. As long as they were coping with extreme stress, these men performed with pinpoint focus.

and his behavior normalized. I had never come across a treatment that could produce such a dramatic change in mental functioning in so brief a period of time. So when Seaburn offered to give me a neurofeedback test,

less susceptible to automatic stress reactions and better able to focus on ordinary events. After all, stress is not an inherent property of events themselves. It is a function of how we lay

events themselves. It is a function of how we label and react to them. Neurofeedback simply stabilizes the brain and increases resiliency, allowing us to develop more

most often during sleep. The brain is in an idling state, and the mind is turned inward. If people have too much slow-wave activity while they're awake, their thinking is foggy.

awake, their thinking is foggy, and they exhibit poor judgment and poor impulse control. 80% of children with ADHD and many individuals diagnosed with PTSD

Screaming speeds up brainwaves. Theta frequencies, from 5 to 8 hertz, predominate at the edge of sleep, as in the floating hypnopompic state I described in Chapter 15 on EMDO.

sleep, as in the floating hypnopompic state I described in Chapter 15 on EMDR. They are also characteristic of hypnotic trance states. Theta waves create a frame

EEG neurofeedback treatments for PTSD, alpha-theta training, makes use of that quality to loosen frozen associations and facilitate new learning.

makes use of that quality to loosen frozen associations and facilitate new learning. Now the downside, Theta frequencies also occur when we're out of it.

Sports medicine was the only department in Boston University that had any familiarity with the subject. One of my earliest teachers in brain physiology was the sports psychologist,

attention of specialists in Attention Deficit Hyperactivity Disorder, or ADHD. At least 36 studies have shown that neurofeedback can be an effective and

The QEEG can also show how well brain regions are communicating or working together. Several large QEEG databases of both normal and abnormal patterns are available.

need to be trained to generate different frequencies and communication patterns. These explanations help them shift from self-blaming attempts to control their behavior to learning

minor provocations. Other traumatized patients show patterns of hyperactivity the moment they close their eyes. Not seeing what is going on around them makes them panic.

of power in these soldiers reflects a state of persistent agitation. At the same time, the brain waves at the front of the brain, which normally have high levels of beta, show a progressive

which normally have high levels of beta, show a progressive slowing with each deployment. The soldiers gradually develop frontal lobe activity that resembles that of children with ADHD.

which interferes with their executive functioning and capacity for focused attention. The net effect is that arousal, which is supposed to provide us with the energy needed to function,

hospital for further treatment. 14 out of 15 were using significantly less medication. In contrast, every vet in the comparison group experienced an increase in PTA.

Literature, which lacks any negative study, suggests that neurofeedback plays a major therapeutic role in many different areas. In my opinion, if any medication had demonstrated such a wide spectrum of efficacy...

circuits may underlie many mental disorders. Three years later, Intel announced that NIMH was reorienting its research away from DSM categories.

said. It calmed me down. It stopped the dissociation. I can use my feelings. I'm not running away from them. I'm not held hostage by them. I can't turn them off and on but

Finding Your Voice, Communal Rhythms, and Theatre. Acting is not about putting on a character, but discovering the character within you. You are the character.

set him on the road to becoming the creative, loving adult he is today. Our sense of agency, how much we feel in control, is defined by our relationship with

Our sense of agency, how much we feel in control, is defined by our relationship with our bodies and its rhythms. Our waking and sleeping and how we eat.

of agency, how much we feel in control, is defined by our relationship with our bodies and its rhythms. Our waking and sleeping and how we eat, sit, and walk.

to convert the VA clinic, where I'd meet my patients, into a shelter for homeless veterans. Standing on a stage with professional actors, speaking about their memories of the war, and reading their faces,

another's emotions and reactions. Greek drama may have served as a ritual reintegration for combat veterans. At the time, Aeschylus wrote the Oresteia Trilogy, and

of the Trojan War's greatest heroes, reads like a textbook description of traumatic stress. In 2008, writer and director Brian Dorries arranged a reading of Ajax for 500 Marines.

in Latin, which enabled him to read 1,500-year-old Roman manuals on military tactics. He learned that the Roman general Lycurgus had introduced marching in step to the Roman legions.

Treating trauma through theater. It is surprising how little research exists on how collective ceremonies affect the mind and brain, and how they might prevent or eliminate trauma.

another by deeply experiencing their common humanity.

tune, inarticulate, uncoordinated, and purposeless. They are too hyper-aroused to notice what is going on around them. They are easily triggered and rely on action.

They are too hyper-aroused to notice what is going on around them. They are easily triggered and rely on action rather than words to discharge their feelings.

First, we get them up and walking around the room, then we start to create a balance in the space, so they're not walking aimlessly, but become aware of other people. Gradually, with little prompt...

Then we start to create a balance in the space, so they're not walking aimlessly but become aware of other people. Gradually, with little prompts, it becomes more complex. Just walk on your toes.

Just walk on your toes, or on your heels, or walk backwards. Then when you bump into someone, scream and fall down. After maybe 30 prompts,

After maybe 30 prompts, they're out there waving their arms in the air, and we get a full-body warm-up. But it's incremental. If you take too big a jump, you'll see them hit the wall.

them hit the wall. You have to make it safe for them to notice each other once their bodies are a little more free. I might use the prompt, don't make eye contact with anyone, just look at the floor.

You have to make it safe for them to notice each other, once their bodies are a little more free. I might use the prompt, Don't make eye contact with anyone, just look at the floor. Most of them are thinking,

Most of them are thinking, great, I'm doing that already, but then I say, now, begin to notice people as you go by, but don't let them see you looking. And next, just make

Now, begin to notice people as you go by, but don't let them see you looking. And next, just make eye contact for a second. Then, now no eye contact.

And next, just make eye contact for a second, then, now no eye contact. Now contact. Now no contact.

Now no contact. Now make eye contact and hold it. Too long. You'll know when it's too long because you'll either want to start dating that person or to have a fight.

Traumatized adolescents are noticeably out of sync. In the Trauma Center's Trauma Drama program, we use mirroring exercises to help them get in tune with one another.

trauma drama program, we use mirroring exercises to help them get in tune with one another. They move their right arm up, and their partner mirrors it. They twirl, and their partner twirls in response.

how their own natural movements differ from those of others, and how unaccustomed movements and expressions make them feel. Mirroring loosens their preoccupation with what other people think.

and helps them attune viscerally, not cognitively, to someone else's experience. When mirroring ends in giggles, it's a sure indication that our participants feel safe.

A member of the class is then invited to replace one of the actors and show how he or she would feel and behave in this situation. These scenarios enable the students to observe

and show how he or she would feel and behave in this situation. These scenarios enable the students to observe day-to-day problems with some emotional distance, or like

These scenarios enable the students to observe day-to-day problems with some emotional distance while experimenting with various solutions. Will they confront the tormentors?

Call the homeroom teacher. Tell their parents what happened. Another volunteer is then asked to try a different approach, so that students can see how other choices might play out.

their spontaneity and enthusiasm. Onset of puberty was one obvious factor for the change, but might there be others? When we delved further, we found that

obvious factor for the change, but might there be others? When we delved further, we found that the older children had experienced more than twice as much trauma as the younger ones.

but might there be others? When we delved further, we found that the older children had experienced more than twice as much trauma as the younger ones.

out or go into defiant withdrawal. We were shocked to discover that in scenes where someone was in physical danger, the students always sided with the aggressors.

We were shocked to discover that, in scenes where someone was in physical danger, the students always sided with the aggressors. Because they could not tolerate any sign of weakness in themselves,

Foster care children often answer to multiple people in charge. If they want to switch schools, for example, they have to deal with foster parents, school officials, the foster care agency, and sometimes a judge.

school officials, the foster care agency, and sometimes a judge. This tends to make them politically savvy, and they learn all too well how to play people.

see the consequences of their decisions and actions laid out directly before their eyes. If you want to give them a sense of control, you have to give them power over their destiny rather

The idea is to inspire the actors to sense their reactions to the words and soon discover the character. Rather than, I have to remember my lines, the emphasis is on the words.

actors to sense their reactions to the words and soon discover the character. Rather than I have to remember my lines, the emphasis is on what do these words mean to me.

actions to the words, and soon discover the character. Rather than, I have to remember my lines, the emphasis is on, what do these words mean to me? What effect do I?

issue, arguably the greatest threat to our national well-being. Since 2001, far more Americans have died at the hands of their partners or other family members than in the war

social isolation, widespread availability of guns, and substandard housing all are breeding grounds for trauma. Trauma breeds further trauma.

of guns and substandard housing, all are breeding grounds for trauma. Trauma breeds further trauma. Hurt people hurt other people.

and manage relationships. Where traumatized children are concerned, the last things we should be cutting from school schedules are the activities that can do precisely that—chorus,

Indian reservations. The greatest hope for traumatized, abused, and neglected children is to receive a good education in schools where they are seen and known.

when a child is throwing a tantrum or making her sit alone in the corner, teachers are encouraged to notice and name the child's experience, as in, I can see how upset you are.

Would you like to go to the safe spot or sit on my lap? And help her find words to describe her feelings and begin to find her voice, as in, what will happen when you get home after class?

hitting his teacher and throwing objects around. We encourage his teacher to set clear limits while gently talking to him. Would you like to wrap that blanket around you to help you calm down?

limits while gently talking to him. Would you like to wrap that blanket around you to help you calm down? The kid is likely to scream no, but then curl up under the blanket and settle down.

often have no idea how people can effectively work together, and inconsistency only promotes further confusion. Trauma-sensitive teachers soon realize that calling a parent

work together, and inconsistency only promotes further confusion. Trauma-sensitive teachers soon realize that calling a parent about an obstreperous kid is likely to result in a beating.

areas that notice our inner sensations. The Self-Observing Watchtower discussed in Chapter 4. So a teacher might say, Shall we take some deep breaths or use the breathing

wrapped in a heavy blanket while listening to some soothing music through headphones. Safe areas can help kids calm down by providing stimulating sensory awareness.

Shoebox is filled with soft brushes and flexible toys. When the child is ready to talk again, he is encouraged to tell someone what is going on before he rejoins the group.

what is going on before he rejoins the group. Kids as young as three can blow soap bubbles and learn that when they slow down their breathing to six breaths per minute and focus on the out-breath,

When their chest tightens, it probably means that they are nervous. Their breathing becomes shallow and they feel uptight. What does anger feel like and what can

they are nervous, their breathing becomes shallow, and they feel uptight. What does anger feel like? And what can they do to change that sensation in their body?

by asking them to demonstrate games to the little kids who need their help. Teachers and leaders learn that an activity as simple as trying to keep a beach ball in the air as long as possible helps groups

just as we do in our own clinic. Children and adults alike need to experience how rewarding it is to work at the edge of their abilities.

adults alike, need to experience how rewarding it is to work at the edge of their abilities. Resilience is the product of agency, knowing that what you can do can make a difference.

worth living. I can't begin to imagine how I would have coped with what many of my patients have endured, and I see their symptoms as part of their strength, the ways they have learned to survive.

exemplary teachers, nurses, scientists, and artists. Most great instigators of social change have intimate personal knowledge of trauma.

came from having dealt with devastation. The same is true of societies. Many of our most profound advances grew out of experiencing trauma—the abolition of slavery from the civil

Many of our most profound advances grew out of experiencing trauma. The abolition of slavery from the Civil War, Social Security in response to the Great Depression, and the GI Bill.

War, Social Security in response to the Great Depression, and the G.I. Bill, which produced our once vast and prosperous middle class from World War II.

